Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Automakers' Recent Parts Procurement 
Plans Reveal Little Growth; Nissan To Build Auto Suspensions 
Overseas, Boost Local Content 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Recent Japan-U.S. Route Dispute 
Sparks Deeper Concern 

   Defense Industry - SJAC Forms Committee To Study Aerospace 
Industry Base 

   Economic Trends - MOT To Initiate Tourist Expansion Program To 
Ease Trade Tensions 

   Energy/Petroleum - Tokyo Gas Introduces New 'Composite Energy 
System' 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Article Says MOF Prepared To Stop 
Money Flows to North Korea; FEATURE:  Financial Institutions 
Expanding Derivatives Operations; Tokyo Exchange May Relax 
Regulations To Attract Asian Companies 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Sony To Reimport Camcorder 
Parts From Shanghai Joint Venture Firm; SMS Technologies Establishes 
Joint Venture To Make Switching Devices 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Business Agreement Between Japanese Insurance Firm, 
Local Company 

   RUSSIA:  Japanese Retail Chain To Expand Operations in Russian 
Far East 

   UNITED STATES:  Aichi Steel Works Signs Consulting Contract With 
Steel Firm 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Companies Seeking To Help Vietnam Expand 
Steel Production; Sumitomo Marine &amp; Fire Latest Insurance Firm To 
Open Hanoi Office 

   Japan-U.S. Relations - FEATURE:  Tug of War With U.S. Over 
Corporate Transfer Pricing 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Sales Languish, 
Firms Take Cost-Cutting Measures; Okuma To Sell Numerically 
Controlled Lathes in China 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Four New Orders 
for Its Cenju-3 Supercomputer; Fujitsu Wins Contracts To Build 
University LAN Networks; TDK To Import Semiconductors From Its U.S. 
Subsidiary 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE: Labor Disputes Within 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises On Rise; Planning Commission Outlines 
Investment System Changes; Bill Drafted on Transfer of Enterprise 
Property Rights; State Planning Commission Proposes Measures To 
Develop Rural Enterprises; Objectives Set To Establish Securitized 
Mortgage Market; Shanghai GNP Grows at Annual 13 Percent in First 
Quarter of 1994; Shortage Leads to Rising Office Rents in Beijing 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Yunnan To Emphasize Economic 
Relations With Southeast Asia; Foreign Investors Wary of Value-Added 
Land Tax; Guangzhou's Six Measures To Increase Utilization of 
Foreign Capital; Guangdong To Attract $10 Billion of Foreign 
Investment in 1994; Shenzhen's Exports, Investment, Foreign Trade 
Grow by 20 Percent; Xiamen Woos Foreign Capital for Designated 
Projects; Hong Kong Investors Pour $1 Billion Into Tianjin in 1993; 
China's Squeeze on Imports Affects Export Trade; Imports of Capital 
Goods Rise in January; Steel Firm To Use Hong Kong as Base for 
Regional Expansion; Contracts Signed With China During Berlin 
Mayor's Visit; Hutchison To Manage Zhuhai Port; Hutchison Invests 
2.5 Billion Yuan for Share of Port Project; Li Companies To Operate 
Power Stations in Guangdong's Nanhai; French Loan To Fund Water 
Supply Project in Xiamen; Japanese, ROK Banks Fund Steel Plant in 
Guangzhou; MING PAO Parent in Sichuan Light Rail System; Chartered 
Bank To Open Representative in Chengdu; Foreign Capital Sought To 
Construct Aviation Fuel Stations; Hong Kong-Based PRC Firms Invest 
in Shanghai-Nanjing Expressway; Pacific Concord To Invest 6 Billion 
Yuan in Retail Sector, Housing; Japanese Firm To Supply Coal 
Handling Equipment; ELF Aquitaine Invests in Chemicals, 
Pharmaceutical Sectors; Singapore Firm Invests in Suzhou Tourism 
Area; Merrill Lynch, Sanyo Invest in Anhui; Sino-UK 
Telecommunications Firm To Increase Output; Volkswagen, U.S. 
Technology Firm To Invest in Hainan; Fujian Company Provides Labor 
Services Overseas 

   Taiwan:  KMT-Run Enterprise To Build Power Plant in Indonesia; 
1993 Overseas Investment Increases 41.7 Percent Over Previous Year 

   NORTH KOREA:  Average Wages for Workers Reported; DPRK Obtains 
Foreign Currency Through 'Foreign Exchange Shops'; Worsening 
Inflation in North Korea Reported 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Research Institutes Get High-Tech Help 
From MIT, Stanford; FEATURE:  New Government Initiatives To Support 
Commercial S&amp;T; FEATURE:  Developments in Database Industry 
Reported; FEATURE:  New ROK 'Foundation' Aims at U.S. High-Tech; 
FEATURE:  South Korea Responds to 'Technical Trade Barriers'; 
Samsung Electronics Indigenizes Several Technologies; Competition 
for Color Printer Market Expected To Heat Up; Daewoo To Expand R&amp;D 
Centers at Home, Abroad; Statistics for First Quarter Exports 
Reported; KINITI To Promote Tech Transfers for Small Firms; ROK- 
DPRK-China Shipping Route To Open in April; ROK Firms Receive 
Shipbuilding Orders From Hong Kong, Canada; Firms Invest in Overseas 
Spinning Plants; Daewoo Gets Financing From Exim Bank for Overseas 
Plant; Hyundai Active in Saudi Power Plant Construction 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Joint Venture Brewery To Be Established 

   INDONESIA:  Cambodia To Use Palapa Satellite Transponder; IPTN- 
Airbus Industrie Flight Test Agreement Signed 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Islamic Money Market Established 
   PHILIPPINES:  International Consortium Seeks To Operate Bataan 
Nuclear Plant 

   THAILAND:  Oil-Related Joint Venture in Vietnam Reported; First 
Quarter Rice Exports Reach 1.3 Million Tons; Firms Form Consulting 
Company With Burmese State Agency; CP Group To Invest in Shanghai 
Industrial Park; Regional Banks' Loan Package to Refinery Company; 
Firm Signs Memorandum on Lao Hydropower Project; Bank Reports 
Decline in Foreign Investment 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Export Processing Zones' Development 
Reviewed; Thai Firm To Build Industrial Zone at Bien Hoa; Ministry's 
Plan for Development of Auto Industry; Park Resort Venture With 
Singaporean Company; Minister Outlines Measures to Facilitiate 
Investment; Prices, Export-Import Value Increase in First Quarter; 
Heavy Industries Increase Output in First Quarter; Taiwan Firms Join 
Sugar Production Venture; HCMC Lists 265 Projects Needing Foreign 
Investment; Coffee Output Reported; Exporters Using Direct 
Contracts; Cashew Growers Earn Over $40 Million in 1993; Transformer 
Manufacture With Switzerland Reported; First Quarter Foreign 
Investment Figures in Dong Nai Reported; National Power Company To 
Start Operation in May; Construction Begins on Bach Ho-Ba Ria Gas 
Pipeline 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-08) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Automakers' Recent Parts Procurement 
Plans Reveal Little Growth -- On 29 March, Honda Motor Co. and Mazda 
Motor Corp. became the last two of the five major Japanese 
automobile makers to formally announce "independent plans" to 
increase their procurement of U.S.-made auto parts, according to the 
30 March YOMIURI SHIMBUN.  In response to U.S. pressure and possible 
sanctions, each of the five firms, including Toyota Motor Corp., 
Nissan Motor Co., and Mitsubishi Motors Corp., have released 
purchase plans over the past several weeks.  According to the 10 
March ASAHI SHIMBUN, the companies have "intentionally" drawn up 
separate plans with different dates and announced these plans at 
different times "so that they would not be considered as one 
package" by the United States.  YOMIURI stated that the companies 
"fear" the United States will treat their purchase plans as "public 
commitments," as happened with their FY94 procurement goals. Thus, 
the firms are emphasizing that their plans are "forecasts" and not 
goals . 

   The 4 April NIKKEI WEEKLY asserted that the automakers will 
"sharply increase" purchases from foreign suppliers, especially the 
United States.  But the claim of large increases is not borne out by 
the the figures on company purchase plans contained in the 30 and 31 
March YOMIURI and the 4 April NIKKEI WEEKLY, compiled below. 
(Figures are in billions of dollars. 1992 figures are actual; 1993 
figures are estimated; 1994 figures are voluntary targets set in 
January 1992; and 1995-1997 figures are "planned" purchase figures. 
The newspapers did not provide figures and estimates for all years.) 


              Fiscal         Local           Parts 
              Year          Purchases        Imports        Total 

Toyota        1993           3.50            1.20         4.70 
              1994           3.82            1.46         5.28 
              1996           5.15            1.30         6.45 

Nissan        1992           1.95            0.44         2.39 
              1994           2.90            0.80         3.70 
              1997           3.40            0.90         4.30 
Mitsubishi    1993           0.65            0.26         0.91 
              1994           1.20            0.40         1.60 
              1996           1.40-1.63       0.35-0.44    1.75-2.07 

Honda         1992           3.21            0.53         3.74 
              1994           4.38            0.56         4.94 
              1995           4.65            0.54         5.19 

Mazda         1993           1.65            0.19         1.84 
              1994           1.90            0.40         2.30 
              1997           1.90            0.35         2.25 



   The figures show that all companies, except Mazda, are 
forecasting an expansion of "local" parts purchases for vehicles 
built in the United States, which press reports attribute to 
increased Japanese auto production in the United States.  For 
example, the 26 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN stated that Nissan will 
increase local procurement as production at its Tennessee auto plant 
reaches "full capacity," while the 29 March NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
reported that Toyota is progressing towards "doubling" its 
production capacity in the United States, which will lead to greater 
local procurement of "parts and materials." 

   According to the above figures, however, only Nissan is planning 
to increase imports into Japan of U.S.-made auto parts beyond its 
FY94 goals, although Mitsubishi has given a range that might exceed 
FY94's level.  Further, several press reports only mentioned the new 
purchase plans in comparison with FY93 procurement levels, in which 
case all automakers show increasing imports.  For example, the 30 
March NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN stated that Mazda plans to "raise" 
imports from just under $2 billion in FY93 to about $3.5 billion for 
FY97, but did not mention Mazda's FY97 import goal is $.5 billion 
less that the firm's FY94 goal of $4 billion. 

   According to the 31 March YOMIURI, unless Japan's auto market 
recovers soon, the automakers will find it difficult to attain "even 
their FY94 procurement goals."  The paper stated that based on the 
expected FY93 figures, both Toyota and Nissan will have to boost 
procurement over 10 percent in one year to reach their FY94 goals, 
while Honda, Mitsubishi, and Mazda are between 20 and 40 percent 
short of their goals. 

   Ministry of Finance Statistics on Principal Auto Parts Trade - 
The following chart, based on Ministry of Finance trade statistics 
obtained from the Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, lists 
Japanese imports and exports of auto parts with the United States 
according to the International Harmonized Commodity Description and 
Coding System, which shows Japanese auto parts imports by specific 
category. 


         Japanese Auto Part Exports/Imports To/From the United 
States 
                       (Figures in millions of dollars) 
Trade Codes- 
Descriptions        1990          1992          1992          1993 

8708:  bumpers, seat belts, brakes, gear boxes, drive axles, shock 
absorbers, mufflers, clutches, and steering wheels. 

  Exports          5,340         5,241         5,761         6,534 
  Imports            223           266           308           354 

84073:  diesel and gasoline automobile engines. 

  Exports          1,247         1,189         1,567         2,015 
  Imports              2             3            41           103 

8483:  transmission shafts, housings and housed bearings, gears, 
flywheels, pulleys, clutches, shaft couplings, and parts thereof. 

  Exports            388           387           435           539 
  Imports             87            82            96           100 

8511:  spark plugs, distributors, ignition parts, and starter 
related motors and equipment. 

  Exports            415           354           397           503 
  Imports             29            25            36            39 

8512:  lighting and signaling equipment, sound signaling equipment, 
windshield wipers, defrosters, and related parts. 

  Exports            208           213           230           260 
  Imports              6             4             5             8 


   Nissan To Build Auto Suspensions Overseas, Boost Local Content - 
Nissan Motor Co. soon will begin production of automobile suspension 
assemblies at its manufacturing bases in the United States, Mexico, 
and Britain.  Following this move, virtually all "critical" auto 
parts, except transmissions, will be produced at its overseas 
facilities.  The value of the suspension systems produced overseas 
is expected to exceed 10 billion yen ($95 million) annually, which 
will contribute "greatly" to achieving Nissan's recently announced 
plans to expand purchases of foreign-made auto parts. 

   The suspension systems are a new type, "multi-ring beam 
suspensions," that Nissan began making for the new "Sunny" model in 
Japan.  By the end of 1994, Nissan plans to produce them at its U.S. 
plant in Tennessee for "Sentra" models; by early next year it will 
produce them in Mexico for the "Sol;" and in 1996 they will be made 
in Britain for "Primera" models.  Total annual production of Sentra, 
Sol, and Primera models is expected to be between 400,000 and 
500,000 units. 

   Nissan has already begun manufacturing engines in Mexico and 
Britain and is assembling engines in the United States. 
Consequently, localizing production of the remaining critical parts- 
-suspension systems and transmissions--had become a "hot topic."  In 
addition, local production will help Nissan attain its recently 
announced goal of purchasing $3.4 billion in U.S. auto parts in 
FY97.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 31 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Recent Japan-U.S. Route Dispute 
Sparks Deeper Concern -- SUMMARY:  The recent Japan-U.S. aviation 
dispute triggered by the U.S. deferral of a Japan Air Lines (JAL) 
license application for a new Sendai-Honolulu route has developed 
into a retaliatory conflict, in which both sides have reduced the 
time spans on their respective licenses for existing routes between 
both countries, according to press reports.  The Kansai 
International Airport Co. is particularly concerned about this 
conflict because its new international airport in Osaka is scheduled 
to open in September 1994, and the large revenues it projects from 
airport fees will not materialize if the dispute grows more 
complicated. 

   In a 6 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN article, Mitsuhiro Kusumi, an 
aviation industry commentator, wrote that the heightened tensions 
between the United States and Japan as a result of the deadlocked 
framework talks have given rise to the fear that "new friction" will 
develop over aviation issues.  Kusumi noted that the main issue in 
the dispute concerns "beyond rights," an issue that was not resolved 
in earlier aviation agreements between the two countries. 

   Kusumi explained that aviation industry relations between Japan 
and the United States are based on a general aviation agreement 
signed in 1952 and two "provisional agreements" signed in 1985 and 
1989 respectively.  In both the 1985 and 1989 agreements, the two 
sides agreed to "freeze the rights and interests on existing routes" 
as a regulatory measure on routes the United States had been "freely 
enjoying."  The Japanese side has interpreted the agreements to mean 
that the rights and interests on all routes between the two 
countries and beyond would be frozen, while the United States has 
stressed that the agreements apply to only routes between the two 
countries.  Kusumi wrote that conflict has continued because each 
side has persisted in its own interpretation of the agreements, and 
this has led to "the further entanglement of issues" and mutual 
distrust. 

   For U.S. airlines, Kusumi observed, "beyond rights" are "given, 
natural rights."  He cited the cases where Japan approved licenses 
for U.S. airlines to fly Tokyo-Bangkok and Tokyo-Kuala Lumpur routes 
which, in effect, recognized U.S. "beyond rights" and acknowledged 
the U.S. interpretation of the agreements.  In light of these cases, 
Kusumi explained, the Japanese side "is the violator of the 
agreements" and "falls short" in its criticism of the U.S. deferral 
concerning JAL's license for the Sendai-Honolulu route as being 
"unilateral."  Kusumi noted that in this case Japan asserted its 
"natural rights," and that in deferring the license the United 
States is making a "strong assertion" toward seeking a solution to 
the issue of "beyond rights." 

   Mutual Distrust on Both Sides - According to Kusumi, Japan-U.S. 
aviation talks have been suspended since last year because of a 
"lack of aggressive moves" to reopen them as a result of the 
recession's adverse impact on Japanese airline companies, which are 
suffering from "reduced competitiveness."  He observed that the U.S. 
side is growing "increasingly wary" of Japanese aviation policy 
because it focuses on "protecting the industry" and on a "closed 
market to rescue the industry." 

   On the Japanese side, the Japanese Ministry of Transport (MOT) is 
growing more dubious and distrusting of the negotiating capabilities 
of its counterparts in the U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT), 
according to the 23 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN.  MAINICHI noted that the 
recent U.S. "sanctions" regarding the time limits on licenses for 
existing routes seems to have "passed by" the DOT and were "directly 
imposed by the White House," because they "trample all over" the 
aviation agreements between the two countries. 

   According to MAINICHI, the assistant secretary's position in DOT, 
which is "equivalent" to the director-general's position in MOT's 
Civil Aviation Bureau, has been vacant since the Clinton 
administration took office.  MAINICHI noted that "there is no one to 
do the job" of shouldering responsibility for U.S. aviation policy, 
and that the DOT officials that attend aviation talks "are of the 
deputy director-general level." 

   The Japanese side, MAINICHI added, is also wary because recent 
U.S. measures "strongly reflect" the desires of United Air Lines and 
Federal Express--whose request for additional routes have been 
rejected by the MOT--and because the "opinions" of United's chairman 
and President Clinton show a "close relationship."  The Japanese 
side believes that President Clinton "immediately carries out the 
wishes of private industry." Japan also wonders whether the DOT "has 
properly explained existing Japan-U.S. aviation agreements" to the 
President, MAINICHI noted. 

   Concerns About New Kansai International Airport - The 23 March 
SANKEI SHIMBUN reported that the Kansai International Airport Co. is 
concerned over the potential impact recent events may have on the 
opening of the new Kansai International Airport in September.  The 
airport company is projecting revenues derived from about 90 flights 
daily, or 630 flights a week, but the 34 airline companies 
represented at a recent International Air Transport Association 
meeting only expressed interest in a total of 500 flights weekly. 
According to SANKEI, U.S. airline companies are the "last hope" for 
the airport company, because they have expressed an interest in "30 
percent of the total projected flights."  Any complications in the 
aviation dispute could be "fatally damaging" to the airport. 

   SANKEI noted that foreign and domestic airlines are all 
considering a "downward revision" in the number of flights through 
the Kansai airport because the landing fees are 10 percent higher 
than at Narita International Airport, and fees for one jumbo jet--at 
about 1 million yen ($9,600)--are the highest in the world. 
According to SANKEI, the airport company's deficit will increase by 
an annual 9 billion yen ($86.5 million) if there are ten less 
flights each day than it has projected. 

   MOT To Promote International Flights at Kansai Airport - The 10 
April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the MOT has 
adopted a policy of promoting international flights to Kansai as a 
priority measure.  The MOT has been actively promoting the 
inauguration of international flights to other regional Japanese 
airports because Narita and Osaka's Itami airports have a limited 
capacity for handling international flights.  According to NIKKEI, 
the MOT has decided to focus on Kansai because it wants to develop 
the new facility into a "hub airport" for both international and 
domestic flights.  Under the same policy, the MOT will carefully 
consider requests for international flights into regional airports 
in light of demand trends, and will "enhance" the domestic route 
structure linking regional airports to Kansai.  NIKKEI noted that 
"the MOT is also seeking to back" the Kansai International Airport 
Co. "in attracting more international flights" to Kansai. 

   Defense Industry - SJAC Forms Committee To Study Aerospace 
Industry Base -- The Society of Japanese Aerospace Companies (SJAC), 
an industry association (shadan hojin) chaired by Isamu Kawai, 
chairman of Fuji Heavy Industries, has established a committee to 
study Japan's aerospace industrial base.  The new organ, the 
"Aircraft Industrial Base Study Committee," was established because 
the aerospace industry is facing a difficult business environment, 
including a recession on the part of commercial air carriers, the 
appreciation of the yen, and the aircraft industry's reliance on the 
Japan Defense Agency for 75 percent of its business. 

   The committee, which will have 15 members, will be chaired by 
Yasuyuki Kogure, a managing director of Fuji Heavy Industries.  It 
will have three subcommittees--Technical Foundations Study 
Subcommittee, Production Foundations Study Subcommittee, and the 
Business Issues Study Subcommittee--composed of working-level 
officials that will meet biweekly.  The subcommittees will examine 
"how the industry should respond to the government's new defense 
policy now being planned;" "industry expectations toward defense 
policy;" "what constitutes an effective aircraft industrial base;" 
and "what industrial policy should be and self-help efforts to 
strengthen business structures."  The committee is scheduled to 
complete its work by early fall.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 1 Apr 
94 p 13) 

   Economic Trends - MOT To Initiate Tourist Expansion Program To 
Ease Trade Tensions -- The Ministry of Transportation (MOT) will 
establish a "Japan-U.S. tourist exchange expansion program' to 
expand the number of Japanese tourists visiting the United States by 
the year 2000 and increase the money they spend in order to add to 
the surplus the U.S. enjoys in bilateral tourism.  The ministry's 
objective is to "improve Japan-U.S. relations." 

   In terms of revenues from travelers, in FY92 Japan registered a 
total worldwide deficit of $30.5 billion, of which $10 billion was 
with the United States.  The ministry believes it can increase this 
current deficit--or the U.S. surplus--in earnings from Japanese 
visitors to the United States from $10 billion to $20 billion by 
doubling the number of travelers between the two countries--4.2 
million in FY92--to about eight million.  According to the MOT, the 
objectives of the program will be achieved by "joint Japan-U.S. 
efforts."  However, these objectives will not be "numerical targets" 
which the Japanese Government will guarantee.  The program is also 
not part of Japan's "external economic measures." 

   The MOT plans to submit a proposal to the United States to form 
an "executive committee" to examine specific ways of implementing 
the program.  The executive committee will be established as a joint 
Japan-U.S. effort, and will be led by government officials from both 
countries.  Potential topics for discussion include Japan's 
consideration of measures to expand "leisure time systems" for 
Japanese visitors and U.S. measures to prepare a "service 
infrastructure" for implementing the program.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 29 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Energy/Petroleum - Tokyo Gas Introduces New 'Composite Energy 
System' -- Tokyo Gas, Japan's largest metropolitan gas company, has 
begun operating a composite energy system which uses three new 
energy technologies--fuel cell, solar power, and gas cogeneration- 
-to supply electricity, heating and cooling, and hot water at the 
Senju Technostation, its experimental center in Arakawa-ku, Tokyo, 
which opened on 18 March.  The company's new "Three Fleche (Arrow)" 
system supplies 57 percent of Technostation's energy demand, with 
the remainder supplied by Tokyo Electric Power Co.  The solar 
generation unit supplies 30 kilowatts; the gas cogeneration unit 
supplies 1,360 kilowatts; and a phosphoric acid fuel cell generates 
200 kilowatts of electricity by using hydrogen from vaporized water 
heated by gas. 

   The system requires an investment of 760 million yen ($7.3 
million) to install, but saves up to 40 million yen ($385,000) 
annually in total utility costs.  Companies which install this 
system can also avoid the 300 to 400 million yen ($2.8-3.8 million) 
investment which electric power companies require of consumers with 
service contracts for 2,000 kilowatts or more. 

   Masao Ogura, chief of the Total Energy Systems Division of Tokyo 
Gas, stated:  "Now is the time to look at various energies and make 
them more efficient.  This will also ease the strained resources of 
electric power companies."  The future diffusion of such composite 
energy systems, however, will reduce the number of electric service 
contracts and will create "strong rivalries" between gas and 
electric power companies.  (Tokyo SANKEI SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Article Says MOF Prepared To Stop 
Money Flows to North Korea -- SUMMARY:  A leading Japanese business 
weekly reported that in the event the UN Security Council approves a 
resolution authorizing economic sanctions against North Korea, the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) would "completely stop direct money 
transfers" via Japanese banks to North Korea and strengthen checks 
of luggage at the Niigata Port to prevent travelers to North Korea 
from carrying large amounts of cash.  Although it is not known 
exactly how much money is sent to North Korea, the article stated, 
figures quoted in the media "appear too high." 

   An unattributed article in the 11 April issue of NIKKEI BUSINESS 
reported that the MOF has finished a preparatory study on how Japan 
would implement sanctions against North Korea in the event the UN 
Security Council passes a resolution authorizing economic sanctions. 
According to the article, the ministry will "completely stop direct 
money transfers" via Japanese banks to North Korea and "strengthen 
luggage checks" at Niigata Port to guard against members of the pro- 
North Korean Organization of Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen 
Soren) carrying large amounts of cash when they travel on ships to 
North Korea.  Concerning money transfers through third countries, 
the MOF believes that policing is the responsibility of the third 
country where the transfer to North Korea actually takes place.  If 
the third country involved is also a UN member, the ministry 
believes, they would "also be held responsible" for preventing such 
transfers. 

   Direct Money Transfers Through Japanese Banks - The article 
reported that the MOF plans to stop direct money transfers through 
Japanese banks to North Korea by instituting a rule, based on the 
Foreign Exchange and Trade Control Law, that "all money transfers to 
foreign countries must be approved by the MOF."  At present, 
according to the article, 18 Japanese banks have correspondent 
agreements with two North Korean banks, the Foreign Trade Bank of 
Korea and Taesong Bank, but only two of the 18 banks, Hokkaido 
Takushoku Bank--Japan's 21st largest bank--and Ashikaga Bank--the 
largest regional bank in Tochigi Prefecture-- "are being used for 
money transfers from Japan to North Korea."  According to the 
article, the MOF knows that a total of 4 billion yen ($38 million) 
was transferred to North Korea through Japanese banks in 1993.  Of 
that amount, 90 percent was transferred through Ashikaga Bank and 10 
percent through Hokkaido Takushoku Bank. 

   Money Transfers Through Third Countries - The article observed 
that Japan's administrative system does not  provide the MOF with 
authority to check money transfers through third countries.  It 
pointed out that the Bank of Japan does not possess a mechanism for 
tracking money transferred to foreign countries, even if it was 
transferred through a bank. 

   Yoichi Mabe, director of the Japan-South Korea Economic Research 
Center, was quoted in the article as saying that Chosen Soren 
members own more than 100 restaurants and trading firms overseas. 
Mabe claimed that some members legally send money to their firms in 
China or Switzerland, where they "hand money to North Korean 
representatives."  Another method cited by Mabe is that some Chosen 
Soren members legitimately write bank checks to themselves, go to 
Hong Kong and cash them, and then hand the money "to North Korean 
trading firms in Hong Kong."  The article concluded that, in the 
event the UN resolution is passed, the MOF would state that it is 
impossible for Japan to stop such transfers. 

   MOF's Fear of International Criticism - According to the article, 
the MOF decided to complete its preparatory study "well in advance" 
so that Japan would be prepared to state what it could and could not 
do when and if a UN resolution is passed.  The ministry also 
intended to counter the "international view" that "Japan has a heavy 
responsibility to respond to North Korea's development of nuclear 
weapons" by indicating what preventive measures are within Japan's 
reach.  The article reported that the MOF fears the same criticism- 
"too little, too late"--made by the United States against Japan 
during the Gulf War, if it were "unprepared and slow" in 
implementing economic sanctions. 

   The article explained that nobody, including the MOF, knows 
exactly how much money is actually being transferred to North Korea. 
Saying that "figures quoted here and there" are all "guesses," it 
warned that it would be "dangerous" for Japan to allow "those 
groundless figures to take on lives of their own." 

   Researcher Claims 60 Billion Yen Sent to North Korea - According 
to the article, Katsumi Sato, editor in chief of the journal GENDAI 
KOREA (Modern Korea), a publication for Korea specialists, in 
January 1992 estimated that the amount of funds sent by Chosen Soren 
members to North Korea at 60 billion yen ($571 million) a year. 
According to NIKKEI BUSINESS, the U.S. Congressional Research 
Service (CRS) stated in the 16 February 1994 issue of CRS ISSUE 
BRIEFING that "Chosen Soren members send $600-700 million to North 
Korea a year, and the total amount transferred to North Korea from 
Japan is $1.8 billion a year."  Because Sato visited the United 
States and met with CRS staffers several times in 1992, NIKKEI 
BUSINESS speculated that CRS's numbers "appear to be based on Sato's 
figures. 

   The article indicated that Sato had calculated the 60 billion yen 
figure in the following way.  Using Ministry of Justice statistics 
on reentry permits, he assumed that about 14,500 "Korean residents 
in Japan with North Korean citizenship" leave and reenter Japan 
every year, and that each person who went to North Korea carried 3 
million yen ($28,500), for a total amount of 43.5 billion yen ($414 
million).  He also calculated that each of the 200,000-250,000 
Chosen Soren members sent 100,000 yen ($952) a year to North Korea 
through Chogin Credit Associations and Kongo Insurance, both of 
which are affiliated with Chosen Soren, for a total of 20-25 billion 
yen ($190-238 million).  When the two totals are added together, 
they come to "around 60-70 billion yen ($571-667 million)." 

   Article Questioned Sato's Figure - The NIKKEI BUSINESS article 
used trade statistics compiled by Teruo Komaki, director of the 
Trend Analysis Department of the Institute of Developing Economies, 
to question the $1.8 billion total cited in the CRS ISSUE BRIEF. 
According to Komaki, in 1992 North Korea's total exports amounted to 
$860 million, while its total imports amounted to $1.64 billion, 
leaving it with a trade deficit of $780 million.  The article stated 
that if $1.8 billion were remitted to North Korea from Japan 
annually, "North Korea would have a $1 billion surplus" after 
balancing its trade accounts, a situation that it viewed as very 
unlikely. 

   Concerning Sato's figure of the 60-70 billion yen ($571-667 
million), the article noted that since the 14,500 Korean residents 
had presumably traveled to other places in the world, it would be 
"illogical" to assume that all had visited North Korea.  Moreover, 
since the total number of travelers included babies and old people, 
it also would also be "illogical" to assume that everyone hand- 
carried 3 million yen to North Korea. 

   FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding Derivatives Operations 
- SUMMARY:  Japanese financial institutions are enhancing their 
derivatives operations domestically and abroad, according to press 
reports.  To compensate for declining core businesses profits and to 
hedge against increasing currency and interest rate risks, financial 
institutions are bolstering their derivatives businesses in 
anticipation of further globalization and the concomitant need to 
hedge.  As a result, ancillary businesses have developed in areas 
like financial computer systems and financial insurance. 

   According to the 16 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, the use of 
derivative financial products such as swaps, options, futures, and 
forward contracts is expanding worldwide, particularly in Tokyo's 
financial markets, and has prompted the Bank of Japan to establish a 
"project team" to study their effect.  Moreover, the Ministry of 
Finance will begin incorporating derivatives into its calculations 
of its capital account balance in 1995, according to the 15 April 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Banks, Securities Companies Expanding Derivative Operations - 
Sumitomo Bank was the first Japanese bank to establish local 
subsidiaries specializing in derivatives in New York (1989), London 
(1990), and Hong Kong (1991) in a "trilateral" operation staffed by 
150 people worldwide, according to the 12 April NIKKEI KINYU.  They 
have formulated a competitive "start-to-finish" strategy, ranging 
from derivative product development to marketing, risk management, 
settlement of payments, and accounting. 

   Sakura Bank's wholly-owned subsidiary, Sakura Global Capital, 
located in New York, focuses on derivatives, the NIKKEI KINYU 
article reported.  It introduced two new interest rate derivative 
products in 1994 that had garnered $1.05 billion in contract amounts 
as of the end of March 1994.  In addition, Sakura Global Capital 
will establish a wholly-owned subsidiary in Hong Kong in July 1994 
that will coordinate with Sakura subsidiaries in London and New 
York, paving the way for "trilateral" operations between the United 
States, Europe, and Asia.  During 1994 all major Japanese banks are 
expected to establish "trilateral operational systems" like those of 
Sumitomo and Sakura. 

   Two strategic companies in the Nomura Securities group currently 
specialize in derivatives, according to the 13 April NIKKEI KINYU. 
They are Nomura Option International, established in London in 1990 
to manage risk and to "globalize" Nomura's stock derivatives 
business, and Nomura Capital Service, which entered the over-the- 
counter derivatives market in 1992.  Nomura Capital Service deals in 
highly-liquid derivatives such as interest rate and currency caps 
and floors and "swaptions" (an option to enter into or cancel a 
swap). 

   According to the 12 April NIKKEI KINYU, the Industrial Bank of 
Japan (IBJ) stationed a "capital markets task force" in its New York 
branch in 1991 to nurture its derivative business "though local 
expertise."  The branch's FY93 revenues reportedly grew by 50 
percent over FY92.  In Japan IBJ has concentrated its efforts on the 
derivatives market, according to the 11 March NIKKEI KINYU, because 
it believes "banks can no longer survive on profits from traditional 
lending" and "expansion cannot occur without taking derivatives into 
account."  The chief of IBJ's "financial products development 
division" visited more than ten regional banks recently to discuss 
derivatives.  He is also aggressively encouraging corporations to 
use them as well, holding more than 400 meetings with companies 
during which he analyzes the companies' financial risk position 
caused by interest and currency rate fluctuations and suggests ways 
to reduce such risk through derivatives.  IBJ's "international 
investment division derivative team" earns half the division's 
annual revenues from derivatives transactions. 

   The Bank of Tokyo, anticipating a growing need for companies to 
be able to compensate for fluctuations in interest and exchange 
rates in their operating localities, is increasing capital 
investment and the number of personnel at its London and Hong Kong 
securities subsidiaries to enhance sales of swaps and options, 
according to the 7 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank has already doubled 
its capital investment in Bank of Tokyo Capital Markets in London 
and will double its number of personnel by 1995.  Likewise, it has 
tripled capital investment in its Hong Kong subsidiary, BOT 
International (HK), and plans to increase personnel from the current 
50 employees to 70. 

   For Sanwa Bank, derivatives have been a "strategic area" for 
roughly a year, according to the 24 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank is 
steadily building up its derivatives operations by more than 
quadrupling the number of domestic employees responsible for 
derivatives by the end of April 1994, bringing its worldwide 
derivatives contingent to over 130 people.  Sanwa has established 
derivative-support task forces at its marketing offices and a task 
force of specialists at its Tokyo headquarters to work together in 
response to the growing demand for derivatives.  With the increased 
manpower, derivative transactions have doubled from 15 to 30 per 
month. 

   According to the 23 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, Fuji Bank is 
currently considering establishing a branch or subsidiary in Hong 
Kong through its U.S. subsidiary to specialize in derivatives, and 
has already decided to increase capital investment in its Hong Kong 
securities subsidiary to expand derivatives operations. 

   Derivatives Business Stimulates Computer Systems Development - 
NCI Systems Integration Inc., established by Nippon Steel Corp. in 
1988 to develop financial computer systems, is rapidly expanding its 
derivative-product systems, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
To date it has developed some 40 financial systems and earns roughly 
500 million yen ($4.76 million) annually from developing derivative 
systems for major commercial, long-term credit, and trust banks. 

   The Bank of Tokyo is focusing its efforts on software systems for 
large corporations where derivative transactions are on the rise, 
according to the 29 March NIKKEI KINYU.  It has developed and begun 
marketing new software which accommodates currency exchange options 
data into a personal computer.  With the new software, it is 
possible to account for profits or losses on a currency exchange and 
calculate the settlement amount before the transaction settlement 
date. 

   Tokai Bank will introduce a new on-line system in the fall of 
1994 that connects all its overseas branches and can calculate the 
mark-to-market" price of currency futures contracts, according to 
the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The system already connects London, New 
York, and Tokyo.  The bank currently is expanding it to Singapore 
and Hong Kong and, in the future, will expand it to Los Angeles and 
Frankfurt.  The system is notable for its derivative risk management 
capabilities because it is able to calculate the "mark-to-market" 
price of derivatives at the end of every trading day. 

   In another computer-system related development, according to the 
17 March NIKKEI KINYU, foreign exchange brokers on the Tokyo 
exchange are introducing local area networks (LANs) to enhance their 
derivative product information systems.  Last year Tokyo Forex Co., 
Japan's largest foreign exchange broker, which is affiliated with 
Tokyo Tanshi Co., set up a LAN that connected over 100 trading 
terminals of the two companies.  Ueda Harlow Ltd., a subsidiary of 
Ueda Tanshi Co., established a LAN network connecting Tokyo, Hong 
Kong, Singapore, and Sydney and this year will complete the network 
by connecting these overseas offices with Ueda Tanshi.  According to 
its planning office, Nit tan AP Co. is currently considering 
introducing a LAN as well. 

   Insurance Companies Offer Products To Cover Derivatives - Japan's 
largest nonlife insurance companies--Tokio Marine and Fire, Yasuda 
Fire and Marine, Mitsui Marine and Fire, and Sumitomo Marine and 
Fire--are entering the financial insurance business, according to 
the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  Currently, foreign financial 
institutions are reluctant to engage Japanese firms in derivatives 
transactions due to their declining credit ratings and the 
concomitant credit risk.  With a "credit guarantee" on a derivatives 
transaction from a triple A-rated Japanese insurance company, the 
credit risk is reduced, which allows foreign firms to tap into the 
the growing demand for derivatives in Japan. 

   Tokio Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's largest nonlife insurer, 
recently signed a "credit guarantee contract" on derivatives 
transactions with two European banks, according to the 12 April 
NIKKEI KINYU.  Reportedly this is the first use of such a "credit 
guarantee" in Japan.  Under the terms of the contract Tokio Marine 
will guarantee the payment of principal and interest involved in the 
derivative transaction to the European bank if the Japanese company 
or bank that is the counterparty to the derivative transaction 
defaults.  In return, the company will receive a guarantee fee from 
the foreign bank.  Tokyo Marine anticipates that this "credit 
guarantee" will become a powerful new source of business. 

   Yasuda Fire and Marine Insurance, Japan's second largest nonlife 
insurer, is building a structure to monitor and undertake such 
guarantees, according to the 10 March NIKKEI KINYU.  Although it has 
not entered into "credit guarantee" arrangements in Japan to date, 
and for the time being will simply manage swaps, Yasuda in April 
will upgrade its financial insurance section into a separate 
division and double the number of personnel.  NIKKEI KINYU pointed 
out that the yen-related interest rate swap market Yasuda is 
entering totaled $700 billion as of the end of 1992, "an eighteen- 
fold increase over the 1987 figure." 

   According to the same article, Mitsui Marine and Fire Insurance, 
Japan's third largest nonlife insurer, began its derivative 
insurance business in February.  According to the 14 October 1993 
NIKKEI, through an agreement with Goldman, Sachs and Co., Mitsui 
established Goldman, Sachs, Mitsui Marine and Fire Derivative 
Products to learn "cutting-edge financial techniques" and enhance 
its know-how of derivatives. 

   Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth largest 
nonlife insurer, has established a tie-up with General Electric's 
Financial Guarantee Insurance Company to exchange personnel and 
know-how concerning financial insurance, according to the 8 February 
NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Tokyo Exchange May Relax Regulations To Attract Asian Companies - 
The Tokyo Stock Exchange is considering relaxing regulations 
governing listings on its foreign section to encourage companies, 
especially Asian companies, to list there.  With an increasing 
number of American and European companies applying to delist from 
the exchange because of its low trading volume, and with exchanges 
in the United States and Europe encouraging Asian companies to list 
with them, the Tokyo exchange fears it will be left out of the 
world's capital markets. 

   There has been no new foreign listing on the Tokyo exchange since 
February 1993, while some 22 foreign firms have delisted since last 
year.  In mid-March, the exchange dispatched a group to China and 
other Asian nations to survey their accounting and company oversight 
systems.  Based on the group's findings, the exchange is hammering 
out a policy to stimulate new listings. 

   Currently foreign listing restrictions tend to hinder Asian 
companies from listing on the Tokyo exchange.  According to exchange 
rules, a foreign company's stocks must be listed for a minimum of 
two years at home before it can be listed.  Also, the minimum asset 
and profit requirements companies must meet before they can be 
listed are too large for Asian companies, which tend to be smaller 
than their U.S. and European counterparts.  As a result, the Tokyo 
exchange is using the New York Stock Exchange as its reference point 
in "thinking about fundamentally relaxing regulations so that more 
Asian companies can list there."  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 5 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Sony To Reimport Camcorder 
Parts From Shanghai Joint Venture Firm -- Shanghai Suoguang 
Electronics Co. Ltd., a joint venture company created between Sony 
and Shanghai Jiaodian Co., China's largest electronics manufacturer, 
has begun "reexporting" camcorder "mechanical decks" to Japan.  Sony 
originally planned to export camcorder parts from Japan, assemble 
finished camcorders at Shanghai Suoguang, and sell them in China. 
However, the Chinese Government has delayed lowering the 75 percent 
tariff on imported Japanese parts, making this plan unprofitable. 

   Because there are no Chinese tariffs on parts used in products 
that will be reexported, Shanghai Suoguang now plans to use the 
parts to assemble 100,000 mechanical decks annually and reexport 
them to Sony Koda, a Sony subsidiary based in Aichi Prefecture, 
where they will be incorporated in Sony TR303 export model 
camcorders.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Apr 94 p 11) 

   SMS Technologies Establishes Joint Venture To Make Switching 
Devices - SMS Technologies, a mid-sized electronic-parts trading 
company located in Tokyo, in conjunction with the Shanghai Tape 
Recorder Factory, a Chinese state-run electronics company, will 
establish a joint venture company to manufacture standardized 
switching power sources for use in TV sets and fax machines.  The 
joint venture company, as yet unnamed, will be capitalized between 
$800,000 and $1 million and will be collocated at Shanghai Tape 
Recorder Factory's facilities outside Shanghai.  It will employ 200 
workers and is scheduled to begin producing about 200,000 power 
sources per month in 1995. 

   Thirty percent of the new company's output will be sold to the 
Shanghai Tape Recorder Factory and other Chinese companies, while 
the remaining 70 percent will be exported to Japan and the United 
States.  By creating this joint venture, SMS will create a 
"relatively low-cost" part procurement structure and will 
"strengthen its ties with Chinese state-run companies."  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Apr 94 p 8) 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Business Agreement Between Japanese Insurance Firm, 
Local Company - Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth 
largest nonlife insurance company, concluded a "cooperative business 
agreement" on 6 April with a major insurance company in Kazakhstan, 
according to the 7 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN.  The move by Sumitomo 
sets a precedent among Japanese nonlife insurers, since it will be 
the first agreement by a Japanese  insurance company in any Central 
Asian republic and it will be a precursor to future agreements in 
the other Central Asian Republics.  Sumitomo plans to conclude a 
similar arrangement in Uzbekistan during 1994. 

   Although Kazakhstan does not permit foreign insurance companies 
to operate independently, because of the huge amounts of insurance 
required for large projects, it has decided, in this case, to allow 
Sumitomo to reinsure the local company and to determine for itself 
the insurance premiums it will charge.  The local firm offers 
primarily cargo and accident insurance.   Under the agreement, 
Sumitomo will introduce Japanese companies entering Kazakhstan's 
market to the local company, will reinsure the existing policies the 
local company has, and will provide the local company with damage 
assessment know-how. 
   According to a 7 April NHK NEWS report, carried in the Nikkei 
Telecom database, Sumitomo will aggressively seek out business in 
anticipation of increasing demand for insurance as economic activity 
expands between Kazakhstan and Japan--such as the recent low- 
interest loan from the Export-Import Bank of Japan for energy 
development--and attracts more Japanese companies to the region. 

   RUSSIA:  Japanese Retail Chain To Expand Operations in Russian 
Far East - Shoren, a major wholesaler of general merchandise and 
home electronics products headquartered in Sapporo, is cooperating 
with local Russian companies to expand its chain of retail stores in 
the Russian Far East, according to the 5 April HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN. 
Income from its operations in the Russian Far East already account 
for 2 billion yen ($19 million) of Shoren's 15.5 billion yen ($147.6 
million) in annual sales of over 700 types of household products. 
Shoren is the first Japanese company to build a retail chain on this 
scale in Russia. 

   Shoren currently has three stores in Kamchatka and one each in 
Vladivostok and Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk.  It plans to expand its chain by 
opening ten new stores within a year in Irkutsk, Khabarovsk, 
Yakutsk, Blagoveshchensk, Novosibirsk, and in Central Asian 
republics of Kyrgyzstan and Kazakhstan. 

   Shoren's success or failure in penetrating the Russian market, 
HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN observed, will influence Japan's major general 
trading companies as to whether they should enter the region. 
Likewise, the trading companies consider Shoren a "test case" amid 
growing interest in the Russian Far East. 

   UNITED STATES:  Aichi Steel Works Signs Consulting Contract With 
Steel Firm - Aichi Steel Works, a major specialty steel manufacturer 
affiliated with Toyota Motor, has signed an agreement with 
Louisville Forge and Gear Works Inc., a Kentucky-based manufacturer 
of forged steel products, to provide consulting services concerning 
construction of a new Louisville Forge and Gear Works plant.  Aichi 
will advise the U.S. firm on various aspects of building its new 
plant, including site layout, facility specifications, and product 
finishing processes.  The new plant is still in the planning stage, 
and the Louisville firm has not decided on a location or a 
construction schedule. 

   Louisville Forge and Gear Works currently supplies forged steel 
parts to the "Big Three" U.S. automakers and "several" Japanese 
automakers that assemble vehicles in the United States.  The firm 
has been working with Aichi under a technical assistance agreement 
signed in July 1990.  The two firms also signed a technical 
cooperation agreement in August 1993 concerning crankshaf t 
manufacturing.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 Apr 94 p 10) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Companies Seeking To Help Vietnam Expand 
Steel Production - SUMMARY:  Nippon Steel and NKK, two leading steel 
companies are conducting several feasibility studies on behalf of 
the Vietnamese Government and the state-run Vietnam Steel Co. on how 
Vietnam might expand its steel production to meet the rapidly 
increasing demand.  Kyoei Steel, an electric furnace steel firm, has 
entered into a joint venture agreement with Vietnam Steel and two 
Japanese general trading companies to build a steel mill in Vung Tau 
to produce steel rods and wire. 

   Nippon Steel, the world's largest steel company, and NKK, the 
world's fifth largest steelmaker, are conducting feasibility studies 
concerning the expansion of Vietnam's steel industry, according to 
the 11 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Nippon Steel's study was 
requested by Vietnam's Ministry of Heavy Industry during a November 
1993 visit to Vietnam by Nippon Steel's president, while NKK has 
undertaken its study at the request of the state-run Vietnam Steel 
Co.  While the content of the two studies are similar, NIKKEI SANGYO 
noted, the NKK study focuses on the feasibility of building a steel 
mill in northern Vietnam, while Nippon Steel's study is not limited 
to operations in a specific area of Vietnam.  The firms will submit 
their studies separately with Nippon Steel reportedly aiming to 
formulate its "general conclusions" about the current status of 
Vietnam's steel industry in March. 

   NKK Has Forged Close Ties With Vietnam Steel - NKK sent a 
delegation to Vietnam in 1991 to study the country's steel industry, 
according to the NIKKEI SANGYO article.  A report on the visit 
written by Kenichiro Sekino, head of NKK's International Business 
Development Center, stated that while Vietnam was not ready for 
upgraded steel operations due to poor electricity supplies and 
roads, "exchanges of personnel" could begin.  In 1992 NKK invited 
two Vietnam Steel executives to attend a 3-month training program at 
NKK steel mills and other facilities in Japan.  In November 1992, 
after the executives had returned to Vietnam, Vietnam Steel 
requested that NKK undertake a "pre-feasibility" study concerning 
construction of a steel mill in northern Vietnam that would use iron 
ore mined in That Kei, near the Chinese border.  NKK is reportedly 
completing its study on the site as well as on the demand for steel 
in Vietnam. 

   According to the 16 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN, Vietnam Steel 
also commissioned NKK and Mitsubishi Corp. to conduct a feasibility 
study concerning construction of a electric furnace steel mill with 
a capacity to make 500,000 tons of steel billets annually at Cai 
Ran, located in the outskirts of Hanoi.  Through an adjacent 
continuous casting line the billets would be made into steel bars 
and shaped steel products.  In February 1994 NKK and Mitsubishi sent 
a team of experts to Vietnam to conduct a study of the Cai Ran 
project.  Vietnam Steel now reportedly plans to begin construction 
of the mill in mid-1995, at the earliest, and also has plans for a 
similar mill to be built outside Ho Chi Minh City. 

   According to NIKKAN KOGYO, Vietnam's crude steel output currently 
does not exceed 200,000 tons, while demand is at 800,000 tons and 
will increase to 2.5 or 3 million tons by the year 2000.  This is 
why rapid expansion of steel production facilities is so urgent for 
Vietnam, the paper noted.  The NIKKEI SANGYO article also pointed to 
the Vietnamese Government's desire to expand steel output despite 
the country's poor electric power situation and other 
infrastructural shortcomings. 

   NKK Study on Breaking Up Old Ships for Steel Scrap - NKK has also 
received a request from Vietnam Steel to conduct a pre-feasibility 
study concerning an operation in Vietnam to break apart old ships 
and reuse the high-quality scrap steel, according to the 15 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  As a result of this request, after 
completing its study on Vietnam's steel industry potential, NKK will 
then study the feasibility of establishing a facility on Vietnam's 
coast to break apart ships and build a "relatively small-sized 
electric steel mill" to melt down and process the scrap steel. 

   According to NIKKAN KOGYO, NKK calculates that worldwide, about 
100 million tons of obsolete ships are broken apart annually, with 
10 percent of this work being done in India, Pakistan, and 
Bangladesh.  However, because of the depressed state of ship- 
breaking operations in these countries, this business would have 
strong potential" in Vietnam.  While building a blast furnace or a 
coke furnace mill would be extremely costly, building a small 
electric mill is feasible, except that Vietnam has virtually no 
scrap steel. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO reported NKK also would like to exploit the 
resources of its Shipbuilding Division and use tug boats to tow in a 
facility somewhere on Vietnam's coast at which old ships would be 
broken apart.  The company would furnish the know-how to Vietnam 
Steel to build an electric steel mill near this location to melt 
down the scrap and equip the facility with steel rolling and other 
equipment. 

   Kyoei-Vietnam Steel Joint Venture To Produce Steel Bars - Kyoei 
Steel, an Osaka-based electric steel company, has received approval 
from Vietnam's State Committee to Coordinate Investments to 
establish a joint-venture steel company with Vietnam Steel, 
according to the 10 February NIKKEI SANGYO.  The general trading 
companies Mitsui and Co. and Itochu also will invest in the joint 
venture.  The new company, VINAKYOEI, will be capitalized at $20 
million, with Kyoei contributing 45 percent of the total, Vietnam 
Steel 40 percent, Mitsui 9 percent, and Itochu 6 percent.  The 
company will begin operations in October 1995 and plans to produce 
240 tons of steel rods and wire annually. 

   The 10 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN added that the new plant 
will be built in Phu My District, Ba Ria-Vung Tau Province, and will 
cost $46 million.  The company's management board will consist of 
ten members, including four from Kyoei and Vietnam Steel and one 
each from Mitsui and Itochu.  The board chairman will be Shuichiro 
Takashima, a Kyoei vice president, and the company's president will 
be Mitsuhiro Mori, a Kyoei executive. 

   Sumitomo Marine and Fire Latest Insurance Firm To Open Hanoi 
Office - Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance, Japan's fourth largest 
nonlife insurance company, has received permission from Vietnam's 
Commerce Ministry to establish a Hanoi resident office in August 
1994.  Sumitomo is the fifth Japanese insurance company--following 
Tokio Marine and Fire, Yasuda Fire and Marine, and others--to 
establish an office in Vietnam.  The goal of all insurance firms is 
to provide a full range of accident settlement and  insurance 
services to Japanese companies operating in Vietnam. 

   In 1992 Sumitomo concluded a business agreement with Bao Viet, 
Vietnam's sole national insurance company, through which it received 
reinsurance business.  But with the rapid increase in the number of 
Japanese firms setting up operations in Vietnam, Sumitomo felt it 
necessary to establish an office to provide information to clients 
and to market insurance products. 

   Among other Japanese insurance firms, Nippon Fire and Marine is 
investigating the establishment of an office in Vietnam, while 
Yasuda plans to open a second office--a resident office in Ho Chi 
Minh City--before yearend.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 5 Apr 94 p 
2) 

   Japan-U.S. Relations:  FEATURE:  Tug of War With U.S. Over 
Corporate Transfer Pricing - SUMMARY:  Japan's National Tax 
Administration Agency (NTAA) appears to have made its first 
counterattack on the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS) over its 
"aggressive" tax assessments on Japanese firms operating in the 
United States by ordering Coca Cola Japan to pay $143 million in 
back taxes, the largest assessment of its kind, according to press 
reports.  One academic predicts an escalating tug of war between 
Japan and the United States over which country receives the bulk of 
taxes on the profits of multinational companies. 

   The 26 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the NTAA 
had ordered Coca Cola Japan, a wholly owned Japanese subsidiary of 
the Coca Cola Company, to pay back corporate taxes of 15 billion yen 
($143 million) stemming from a recalculation of the multinational 
company's transfer pricing, the largest assessment it has ever 
imposed.  The NTAA explained that Coca Cola Japan transferred 
profits worth 36 billion yen ($343 million), about one-quarter of 
its total profits, to its U.S. parent company between 1990 and 1992 
by paying its parent royalties which were "higher than usual."  In 
particular, the NTAA judged that royalties paid for canned coffee 
and Chinese tea products, which were the "inventions" of Coca Cola 
Japan, were "too high."  NIKKEI noted that Coca Cola Japan intends 
to appeal the assessment. 

   Reasons Why NTAA Has 'Targeted' Coca Cola Japan - In the 29 March 
TOKYO SHIMBUN, Meiji University Professor Masatsugu Fujie commented 
that the NTAA has "targeted" Coca Cola Japan because it was 
relatively easy to estimate royalties for canned drinks by comparing 
royalties for similar products made by other companies.  Another and 
more important reason for targeting the company, according to Fujie, 
is the "brand power" of Coca Cola, "the symbol of America's cultural 
invasion of postwar Japan."  Fujie concluded that this symbolism 
will have "enormous" influence on other U.S. firms operating in 
Japan. 

   For these reasons, the TOKYO SHIMBUN article observed, the NTAA 
appears "firmly determined" to pursue what it views as Coca Cola 
Japan's tax evasion through inflated transfer pricing.  The paper 
observed that the NTAA asked Finance Minister Hirohisa Fujii for 
approval to impose the assessment on Coca Cola Japan because of the 
parent firm's "political connections to the current U.S. 
administration."  Usually, the only approval required to impose 
additional taxes is from the NTAA director general. 

   NTAA's Frustration With Aggressiveness of IRS - The 29 March 
TOKYO SHIMBUN quoted Hitotsubashi University Prof. Mitsuhiro Ishi as 
characterizing the NTAA's action as a "declaration of a tax war" 
against the IRS.  Ishi stated that since the IRS has been 
"aggressively" taxing Japanese companies operating in the United 
States, which in turn have been receiving credits from the NTAA for 
the higher taxes paid to the IRS, the Coca Cola case is an 
expression of the NTAA's firm resolve "not to let the IRS do 
whatever it wants."  TOKYO SHIMBUN also noted the mounting 
frustration within the NTAA, capsulized in the remark by an 
anonymous official:  "How long do we let the IRS take our tax 
money?" 

   According to the TOKYO SHIMBUN article, the NTAA has not been 
able to effectively impose assessments based on "questionable" 
transfer pricing practices employed by U.S. companies operating in 
Japan because of legal differences between Japan and the United 
States.  Under Japanese law the NTAA must prove that the Japanese 
subsidiary of a U.S. company has transferred a part of profits to 
its parent firm "to evade taxes," while under U.S. law a foreign 
company must prove it has not done this.  In 1993, for example, the 
NTAA tried to "reinterpret" the transfer pricing policies of U.S. 
securities firms in Japan, which had reaped "huge profits" while all 
Japanese securities firms suffered losses, however, the NTAA had to 
give up "because it was too difficult to prove."  According to the 
article, lack of resources on the part of the NTAA has also limited 
it from charging foreign firms with transfer pricing irregularities. 
Beginning in FY94, however, the number of auditors examining foreign 
firms will double from 9 to 18 in order to "more aggressively 
pursue" cases of tax evasion by foreign companies. 

   The TOKYO SHIMBUN article reported that "contrary" to the NTAA, 
the IRS had become "more aggressive" in reassessing the transfer 
pricing of Japanese companies in the United States since the spring 
of 1993, when the IRS introduced a rule allowing itself to assume 
profits on the part of Japanese companies based on the profits of 
U.S. companies in the same industry.  The 26 March NIKKEI reported 
that under the Clinton administration, the IRS had "tightened up" 
taxation on international transfers of patent fees, royalties, and 
other intangible assets.  In the TOKYO SHIMBUN article, Prof. Ishi 
also commented that the IRS "targets foreign--particularly Japanese- 
-companies" because assessing heavier taxes on foreign firms "is the 
easiest way to increase tax revenues."  In addition, Ishi noted the 
idea of "attacking" Japanese companies will be received with 
"political favor" by American voters. 

   Tug of War Over Corporate Taxes Likely To Continue - In the TOKYO 
SHIMBUN article, Prof. Ishi predicted that the "tug of war" over 
which country will receive the profits of multinational companies is 
unlikely to be settled quickly.  One reason is the complexity of the 
issues concerning international transfers of profits derived from 
royalties, patent fees, and other intangible assets.  As one 
example, he explained that taxes on royalties can be very difficult 
and complicated to calculate, and that in a broader, international 
context it will take a long time to reach any multilateral agreement 
on rules for taxing royalties.  "In the absence of agreed-upon 
rules," Ishi concluded, the number of disputes over transfer pricing 
"will likely increase in the future." 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  Machine Tool Sales Languish, 
Firms Take Cost-Cutting Measures -- SUMMARY:  Machine tool orders 
for January and February 1994 were down by double-digit amounts 
compared to 1993, and several companies reported losses for FY93, 
which ended on 31 March, according to press reports. Companies are 
resorting to a number of measures to cut costs, including moving and 
merging corporate offices, soliciting "voluntary" retirements, and 
eliminating divisions and subsidiaries. 

   According to the 11 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), an 
industry survey conducted by the Japan Machine Tool Builders' 
Association (JMTBA) showed total machine tool orders for January 
came to 37.976 billion yen, down 11.6 percent from January 1993 and 
also down 5.2 percent from December 1993.  January domestic orders 
were down 27.7 percent from 1993 to 19.17 billion yen ($182.6 
million).  "This is the first time domestic orders have dropped 
below the 20 billion yen ($190.5 million) level" since JMTBA began 
conducting its surveys in 1983.  Orders from the general machinery 
industry fell 31.3 percent and orders from the auto industry fell 
54.1 percent.  Export orders came to 18.869 billion yen ($179.7 
million), down 14.4 percent year-on-year, but this total does not 
include overseas production. 

   The JMTBA's February survey, reported in the 5 April NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN, showed total machine tool orders of 38.924 billion 
yen ($370.7 million), down 16.7 percent from February 1993. 
Domestic orders totaled 22.273 billion yen ($212.1 million), up from 
January but down 24.6 percent year-on-year.  Orders from the 
electrical machinery, general machinery, and auto industries were 
down between 20 and 30 percent.  February export orders came to 
16.651 billion yen ($158.58 million), down 3.1 percent.  Exports to 
Europe are still in a slump, but exports to the United States, 
China, and Southeast Asia were good. 

   Several Companies Report Losses for FY93 - Press reports noted 
that a number of machine tool companies have reported current or 
"final" losses for FY93, as follows: 

   Hitachi Seiki--One of Japan's largest manufacturers of CNC lathes 
and machining centers, Hitachi Seiki reported 24 billion yen 
($228.57 million) in machine tool sales in FY93, down 20 percent 
from the previous year, according to the 5 April NIKKEI.  Current 
losses were 6.7 billion yen ($63.8 million) compared to 4.916 
billion yen ($46.82 million) in FY92.  "Final losses" for FY93 were 
4.743 billion yen ($45.17 million), because the firm realized 1.5 
billion yen ($14.3 million) in extraordinary profits from the sale 
of land and facilities in Abiko, Chiba Prefecture.  The company sold 
the land to cover about 800 million yen ($7.62 million) in 
extraordinary losses related to retirement allowances for about 200 
"early and voluntary retirements."  Without the sale, final losses 
would have been greater than the 7.5 billion yen ($71.43 million) in 
surplus funds it had on hand as of March 1993.  For FY94, Hitachi 
Seiki projects sales of 27 billion yen ($257.14 million) and a 
shrinkage of its current losses to 3.4 billion yen ($32.38 million). 

   Hamai--According to the 30 March NIKKEI, Hamai, which specializes 
in machining centers and gear-hobbing machines, is trying to emerge 
from insolvency.  Its liabilities exceeding assets will be 1.3 
billion yen ($12.38 million) at the end of FY93.  Its sales for FY93 
are expected to be 4 billion yen ($38.1 million).  FY93 current 
losses will come to 1.9 billion yen ($18.1 million), compared to 
losses of just under 2.5 billion yen ($23.81 million) for the 
previous six-month period.  Extraordinary losses related to 
allowances for voluntary retirements will cause final losses to 
total 2 billion yen ($19.05 million). 

   Hamai hopes its operating losses can be limited to 12.5 billion 
yen ($14.28 million) for the September 1994 six-month settlement 
period.  Hamai will sell stock from its investment portfolio and 
will sell an employee dormitory in Meguro Ward, Tokyo, to reduce its 
final losses to 1.3 billion yen ($12.38 million) and reduce its 
liabilities in excess of assets to 600 million yen ($5.7 million). 
Hamai is also studying raising over 2 billion yen in extraordinary 
profits by selling its company headquarters building and "some land" 
at its Ashikaga plant in Tochigi Prefecture to entirely eliminate 
its liabilities in excess of assets by the end of FY94. 

   Tsugami--A medium-sized firm specializing in computer-numerically 
controlled lathes and machining centers and which depends on machine 
tools for 90 percent of total sales, Tsugami reported sales of 9.1 
billion yen ($86.6 million) for FY93, down 28 percent from FY92, 
according to the 5 April NIKKEI.  Operating losses were 1.3 billion 
yen ($12.38 million).  Revenues were just over 100 million yen 
($952,000), but nonoperating losses were also 100 million yen. 
Current losses were about 1.4 billion yen ($13.3 million).  This 
compares with current losses of 2.525 billion yen ($24 million) in 
FY92. 

   Tsugami expects a 10 percent increase in sales this year and 
anticipates that its rationalization efforts will reduce current 
losses in FY94 to about 900 million yen ($8.57 million).  The 23 
March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN adds that Tsugami will move its company 
headquarters and its sales subsidiary, Tsugami Kobai, from 
Shimbashi, Tokyo, to Hamamatsu, Shizuoka Prefecture, in mid-April to 
cut office expenses. 

   Nippei Toyama--According to the 1 April NIKKEI, Nippei Toyama, a 
leading machine tool firm that specializes in transfer machines, 
will incur 800 million yen ($7.62 million) in extraordinary losses 
associated with the liquidation of Norion Kogyo, its machine tool 
and industrial machinery assembly and parts subsidiary located in 
Yokohama City.  Nippei will also incur another 550 million yen 
($5.24 million) in extraordinary losses to cover special allowances 
involving the early retirement of 21 workers.  As a result, final 
losses will be 3.7 billion yen ($35.24 million).  NIKKEI noted that 
Nippei is "currently insolvent," but did not disclose the amount by 
which its liabilities exceed total assets. 

   Firms Undertake More Cost-Cutting Efforts - Press reports noted 
that other companies are adopting rationalization and cost cutting 
measures, as follows: 

   Toyoda Machine Works--According to the 10 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Toyoda Machine Works, a subsidiary of the Toyota Motor 
Group, on 1 April will merge two wholly owned subsidiaries, Toyo 
Giken, its machine-tool design company, and High-Tech System, its 
software development firm, both located in Tokyo, into a new 
company, Toyo High Tech.  The new firm will be capitalized at 38 
million yen ($362,000) with Toyoda Machine Works investing the 
entire amount.  The new company, to be located in the former Toyo 
Giken's office space, will employ 190 workers.  Toyo High Tech 
expects to have 2.2 billion yen ($20.95 million) in sales in the 
first fiscal year. 

   Matsuura Machinery--According to the 23 February NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Matsuura, a major manufacturer of high-speed machining 
centers located in Fukui City, Fukui Prefecture, will close two 
business offices in the Kanto region and consolidate their 
operations at its office in Taito Ward, Tokyo.  The offices to be 
closed are its Eastern Kanto Office located in Kashiwa, Chiba 
Prefecture, and the Southern Kanto Office located in Machida City, 
Tokyo.  Matsuura now will serve the Kanto region from its Tokyo 
office and its North Kanto office located in Kawagoe City, Saitama 
Prefecture. 

   Mitsui Seiki Kogyo--According to the 23 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Mitsui Seiki Kogyo, a medium-sized machine tool company, in 
January moved nearly all its headquarters offices from Nihonbashi, 
Tokyo, to its plant in Ota Ward, Tokyo, to save an estimated 500 
million yen ($4.76 million) per year in office rental and 
communications costs. 

   OKK--One of Japan's seven largest machine tool companies that 
specialized in machining centers and numerically controlled milling 
machines, OKK will extend its temporary worker furloughs, which had 
been in effect through March 1994, according to the 7 April NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Between April and June OKK will furlough for a 
total of 12 days workers at its Inagawa plant in Hyogo Prefecture. 
OKK furloughed these workers for 12 days between April and September 
1993, and for 28 days between October 1993 and March 1994.  Since 
October, workers have been furloughed every Friday, a practice the 
firm will continue. 

   In addition, Mitsubishi Motors has agreed to retain 20 OKK 
workers temporarily assigned to its Mizushima plant in Kuraki, 
Okamoto Prefecture, for another six months.  In October 1992, 40 
workers were temporarily assigned to Mitsubishi Motors for one year, 
but were extended through March 1994.  The current six month 
extensions cover only half of the workers. 

   Okuma--According to the 2 April CHUNICHI SHIMBUN, the prolonged 
recession is forcing Okuma, a major machine tool manufacturer, to 
streamline its organization "by eliminating four of its five 
divisions."  The functions of its management, service, 
manufacturing, and technical divisions will be absorbed by its 
Business Division, which will be managed by company president Junro 
Kashiwa. 

   Shoun Machine Tool--According to the 2 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Shoun, a company in the Yanmar Diesel Engine Group, will 
cut its workforce by 36 percent as of 20 June.  To do this, it will 
solicit 92 "voluntary" retirements from workers 50 years of age or 
older, including workers currently on temporary assignment to Shoun 
Shinzaki Engineering and Shoun Seiki, both located in Kamakura, 
Kanagawa Prefecture.  This will reduce Shoun's workforce from 254 to 
162.  Shoun anticipates this move will save about 500 million yen 
($4.76 million) per year in personnel expenses. 

   Okuma To Sell Numerically Controlled Lathes in China - Okuma, a 
leading machine tool manufacturer, has signed an eight-year contract 
to provide the Shenyang Third Machine Tool Factory with the 
technology to manufacture its LB15 series of general-purpose 
numerically controlled lathes.  Initially Okuma will export all 
parts for the lathes, which will be assembled by the Shenyang firm, 
but gradually the ratio of locally procured parts will be increased. 
The finished product will be sold in China under the "Okuma-Shenyang 
Third" brand. 

   Okuma will also set up service centers in Shanghai and Beijing by 
mid-April which will operate by consigning work, performed under the 
supervision of Okuma technicians, to the Shanghai Machine Tool 
Factory and the Beijing Second Machine Tool Factory.  To date Okuma 
has delivered more than 230 lathes to companies in China.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 29 Mar 94 p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Four New Orders 
for Its Cenju-3 Supercomputer -- NEC Corp. has won four orders from 
three Japanese universities and one company for its new "Cenju-3" 
parallel processing supercomputer.  The orders for "core basis" 
machines--which do not include peripheral equipment--have a combined 
value of about 200 million yen ($1.9 million).  NEC has received a 
total of six orders for Cenju-3 machines.  Its first order was from 
Kyoto University in February 1994, and the second was from the Dutch 
Aviation and Space Research Laboratory for joint research use with 
the Swiss National Supercomputer Center.  Consequently, NEC now 
believes it will receive more than ten orders in FY94, which would 
place the company in "hot pursuit" of U.S. firms that make parallel 
processing supercomputers. 

   The latest orders are from Nagoya University, the University of 
Electro-Communications Graduate School, the Yokohama Image 
Transmission Technostation Co., and an unidentified private 
university.  The Nagoya University and Electro-Communications 
University machines were purchased under government procurement 
funding, but NEC "was the only firm to submit bids." 

   The Cenju-3 can be conf igured with up to 256 "VR4400" 64-bit 
RISC processors capable of running at 12.8 billion floating point 
operations per second (GFLOPS).  Yokohama Image Transmission 
Technostation ordered a model with 64 processors capable of 3.2 
GFLOPS for use in "image processing research and development."  The 
three universities ordered a model with 8 processors, NEC's smallest 
configuration, which operates at a speed of 266 million (M) FLOPS. 
Nagoya University will use its supercomputer to aid in research 
concerning the design of highly integrated circuits, and will also 
receive two "EWS48OO" workstations and eight "color X-stations." 
The University of Electro-Communications will use its machine to 
conduct research into advanced parallel information processing, and 
will receive a "complete set" of peripheral equipment, including 
printers.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Fujitsu Wins Contracts To Build University LAN Networks - Fujitsu 
has won contracts to build local area networks (LANs) at 10 national 
universities with funds appropriated in the Japanese Government's 
second FY93 supplemental budget.  Having earlier won LAN contracts 
from eleven universities with funds appropriated under the first 
supplemental budget, Fujitsu now has contracts worth about 3.5 
billion yen ($33 million) from 21 universities.  (For information on 
the earlier LAN contracts, see the 1 December 1993 Pacific Rim 
Economic Review, Vol 2, No 24, p 14.) 

   Fujitsu will build Ethernet LANs connected with fiber distributed 
data interfaces (FDDI) for 10 universities, including Hitotsubashi 
University, Yamagata Medical College, and the University of the 
Ryukyus.  Currently Ethernet and FDDI LANs are the most commonly 
used systems, but Kobe University (under the first supplemental 
budget) chose an asynchronous transfer mode (ATM) LAN. 

   The Ministry of Education plans to build LANs at each of the 92 
public universities in Japan.  At this point the ministry does not 
plan to link the universities together, but it does plan to connect 
each university LAN system to Internet by mid-FY94.  Funds to build 
LANs at 31 universities were contained in the first supplemental 
budget, 28 under the second supplemental budget, and the remaining 
33 universities will hold bids during March.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 3 Mar 94 p 9) 

   TDK To Import Semiconductors From Its U.S. Subsidiary - TDK 
Corp., the world's largest maker of magnetic tapes and a major 
producer of electronics parts, is taking steps to import and market 
in Japan semiconductors produced by its U.S. subsidiary, Silicon 
Systems (SSi).  On 1 April TDK set up a permanent in-house group to 
oversee operations with SSi.  SSi's main products are integrated 
circuits (ICs) for hard disk drives, but the firm also makes "high 
technology" ICs for communications equipment, such as local area 
networks.  TDK is strengthening its efforts to sell products such as 
the "passive elements" used in portable communications equipment. 
By combining its own products with those of SSi, TDK hopes to expand 
its share of the communications market. 

   TDK bought out SSi, a semiconductor manufacturer, in May 1989. 
Until now SSi's products have been sold in Japan through a 
representative, but TDK is assuming control of sales with the 
expiration of SSi's contract with the representative.  SSi holds 
about a 50 percent share of the U.S. market for hard disk drive ICs 
and is promoting sales of ICs for communications equipment.  TDK 
sees SSi's IC products as the "key" to participation in the 
communications equipment market.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 30 Mar 
94 p 12) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE: Labor Disputes Within 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises On Rise -- SUMMARY:  Recent PRC and Hong 
Kong media reveal that Chinese workers have been mistreated by 
foreign-funded enterprises.  The condition is sufficiently serious 
and widespread to draw the attention of the Labor Ministry. 

   Many foreign entrepreneurs, including Taiwan and Hong Kong 
businessmen who have opened factories on the mainland to take 
advantage of low labor costs, have ignored workers' safety and 
sanitary conditions.  The Hong Kong monthly TANG TAI (CONTEMPORARY) 
reports on 15 March that foreign-funded factories in Shenzhen are 
filthy, noisy, and poorly lighted.  According to an article in the 
16 February issue of the Hong Kong biweekly PAI-HSING (THE PEOPLE), 
last November a fire broke out that killed 84 workers and injured 46 
others in a Shenzhen factory owned by a Hong Kong company.  The 
article also reported that dozens of workers lose fingers to 
accidents each year in a foreign-funded hardware factory in the same 
city.  None of the injured workers has received compensation. 

   Low wages, shabby treatment, and even physical attacks against 
workers have also been reported by the media.  According to an 
article in the 21 January issue of Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO, a 
foreign-funded enterprise only pays its workers $18 to $24 monthly 
and often forces them to work overtime up to 15 hours a day, 
including Saturdays and Sundays.  The article also noted that the 
factory building of a foreign-funded shoe factory is so hot that the 
workers frequently suffer heatstroke and their home-made lunches 
often spoil by noon.  Many foreign-funded enterprises have hired 
security guards to supervise the workers, who view them as "hatchet 
men" from the "underworld."  Several female workers in one factory 
were hauled to a small room, stripped, and were badly beaten by 
these security guards after complaining about their low wages, the 
article continued. 

   Another article in ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO reported that a female 
worker in a shoe factory in Fujian was beaten by her boss, a Taiwan 
businessman, after being caught stealing two pairs of shoes.  She 
was further humiliated by being locked up in a dog cage, the stolen 
shoes hanging from her chest.  This same factory pays its worker $11 
to $17 monthly and provides no sick leave. 

   According to a second article in the 16 February PAI HSING, 
disputes between workers and foreign-funded enterprises have 
intensified, and strikes have occurred in Dalian, Zhuhai, and Xiamen 
in the past few years.  For instance, there have been over 30 
strikes, the biggest involving over 700 workers, in Xiamen, an area 
heavily invested in by Taiwanese businessmen. 

   Most workers in foreign-funded enterprises do not have trade 
unions and the few that do exist in some enterprises are too weak to 
protect workers' interests.  According to an article in the 8 
February issue of the Beijing daily ZHONGGUO SHANGBAO, less than 10 
percent of the 47,000 foreign-funded enterprises nationwide have 
labor unions.  The article noted the following reasons for this:  1. 
Foreign entrepreneurs distrust labor unions and think they are 
troublemakers;  2.  Chinese managers do not support labor unions. 
Their goal is to secure more foreign capital, not to look after 
workers' needs; and  3.  Relevant authorities do not consider it 
important to establish labor unions.  They have been trying to 
accommodate foreign businessmen as much as possible and fear that 
labor unions might scare them away. 

   The article also maintained that the few existing trade unions in 
foreign-funded enterprises are but empty shells.  They are expected 
to "support" management views and are not allowed to express 
different opinions.  Some firms even spy on workers and fire those 
workers found to be too close to the labor union. 

   The labor issue has become so serious that the Labor Ministry 
decided to include labor disputes as one of the main targets of its 
comprehensive employment inspection beginning 1 April, according to 
an article in the 19 March Beijing CHINA DAILY.  The article further 
noted that the Labor Ministry, concerned about the growing number of 
labor disputes--3,352 cases in Shenzhen SEZ alone in the first half 
of 1993--will investigate and punish those found guilty of illegal 
practices. 

   Planning Commission Outlines Investment System Changes - An 
unsound state investment system has resulted in overly large 
projects, an irrational investment structure, and low returns on 
investment.  An official in the State Planning Commission disclosed 
that the following six steps will be taken to reform the investment 
system in 1994: 

   1.  Investment projects will be categorized as competitive 
projects, infrastructure projects, and public welfare projects based 
on the efficiency, market demand, and the nature of the investment. 
Enterprises will be the main sponsors of competitive projects, and 
related capital will be raised in the market place.  The state will 
fund infrastructure projects that reinforce central policies, but 
will increase enterprises and local government responsibilities. 
Finally, the state will finance all public welfare projects. 

   2.  An investment risk regulatory system will be established and 
project initiation and approval procedures changed.  For example, a 
legal entity must now be established before making decisions on 
projects and conducting feasibility studies.  Legal entities will be 
given greater independence in decision making. 

   3.  The central government will promulgate macroeconomic 
regulatory policies and define objectives.  Nonetheless, in 
principle, both the central government and the autonomous region or 
provincial government will be held responsible.  Provincial 
governments will be the main sponsors for local infrastructure 
construction. 

   4.  Total investment will no longer be dictated by planned 
targets.  Instead, the state will use indirect economic levers, such 
as funding, to regulate investment. 

   The state will no longer exercise direct control over individual 
investment.  Provincial governments will supervise collective 
investments in accordance with state industrial policies and local 
conditions. 

   5.  Policy funding will be separated from commercial funding. 
Loans for projects that are in accordance with state industrial 
policy can be arranged through commercial banks.  Both individual 
legal entities and banks can make their own choices with respect to 
loans and will assume their own risks.  The government will have a 
regulatory and guidance function. 

   6.  A central policy-oriented investment funding system and a 
state development bank will be established. 

   By establishing an investment scheme that corresponds with a 
socialist market economy, resources will be determined by the 
market.  Meanwhile, the state can regulate investment quantity and 
structure more effectively through financial means, such as using 
domestic and foreign loans, issuing stocks and bonds, and adjusting 
interest rates. 

   The state also plans to compile a comprehensive national index 
showing appropriate national and regional investment scales to help 
the government monitor investment activities around the country and 
regulate them on a timely basis.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO 9 Mar 
94 p 1) 

   Bill Drafted on Transfer of Enterprise Property Rights - An 
official in the State Commission for Restructuring the Economic 
System (CRES) revealed that the preliminary draft of a bill on 
transferring state enterprise property rights has been drawn up. 
According to the official, the government encourages the transfer of 
small enterprise property rights and does not erect ideological 
barriers to the transfer of large and medium-sized enterprise 
property rights.  The government's only concern is that no one has 
the ready capital to buy these new property rights. 

   The Deputy Chief of the Production Department of CRES, Gu Shishi, 
maintained that property-right transfers will not cause a loss of 
assets for state enterprises.  On the contrary, funds derived from 
the transfer of assets will be extremely beneficial in adjusting the 
industrial structure.  Gu stated that since there has always been a 
severe shortage of construction funds, proceeds from property-right 
transfers can be better utilized in more important sectors. 

   An official of the State Asset Management Bureau, Zheng Li, 
contended that proceeds from property right transfers must be used 
in developing transportation, energy, and other infrastructure. 
Zheng further emphasized the following points:  State assets must 
undergo scientific and accurate evaluation; one-time payment is 
mandatory and no installment payments are allowed; ownership of 
assets must be clearly defined; and appropriate arrangements must be 
made for reemployment of workers, labor insurance, and retirement 
benefits after the transfer of property rights.  (Hong Kong CHING 
CHI TAO PAO No 8, 28 Feb 94 p 27) 

   State Planning Commission Proposes Measures To Develop Rural 
Enterprises - According to the 29 March issue of Chongqing XINAN 
JINGJI RIBAO, the State Planning Commission recently proposed 
measures to accelerate development of rural enterprises.  The 
measures are to include rural enterprises in the national economic 
plan to avoid irrational, low-level, duplicative projects, and blind 
development; to include rural enterprises in development programs 
for different trades areas, in the distribution of productive 
forces, and in resource allocation; to use credit and tax measures 
and information to guide rural enterprise policy; to push the 
development of central-western rural enterprises and improve 
cooperation between the east and central-western regions by taking 
advantages of raw materials and energy in the central-west regions 
to support the east, and using the superiority of funds, technology, 
and talent in the east to support central-western regions; and to 
increase funds to develop rural enterprises. 

   The State Planning Commission suggests that rural enterprises be 
allowed to retain at least 60 percent of profits to enhance 
enterprise fund accumulation and self-development ability and 
suggests that the annual rate of increase for loans correspond to 
the annual planned rate of growth for rural enterprises.  The 
commission also encourages provinces, municipalities, and regions to 
set up a rural enterprise development fund.  Loans from 
international financial organizations should be used to develop 
rural enterprises and the state should formulate preferential 
policies to help rural enterprises build small industrial zones. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, the state set up a special fund to 
encourage rural enterprises to increase exports, and during the 
Ninth Five-Year Plan the state should continue to give special loans 
to rural enterprises engaged in exports.  National construction 
projects should be transferred to rural enterprises through joint 
development with state enterprises or by establishing enterprise 
groups. 

   Objectives Set To Establish Securitized Mortgage Market - In 
another step encouraging the development of debt markets, the 
Monetary Authority has set out objectives for establishing a 
domestic mortgage securitization market.  A minimum credit standard 
will be created in this sector under a blueprint being put together 
to ensure Hong Kong gets the best possible credit rating for these 
instruments, standardized documentation, and sufficient liquidity to 
attract major investors.  Andrew Sheng, deputy chief executive of 
the authority, said that the minimum credit standard will be similar 
to the loan standard of the U.S. Federal National Mortgage 
Association.  The Monetary Authority is looking at the legal and 
regulatory implications for banks securitizing their mortgage 
portfolios, such as whether loans would be offloaded from their 
balance sheets without recourse.  Banks are said to be keen to 
spread their risks by securitizing a portion of their mortgage 
assets and property developers want to offload the mortgage 
financing they provide to home buyers from their balance sheets. 
(Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 14 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Shanghai GNP Grows at Annual 13 Percent in First Quarter of 1994 
- Shanghai's GNP in the first quarter of this year reached 42.05 
billion yuan, up 13.1 percent over the same period last year; total 
industrial output value was 87.05 billion yuan, up 13.9 percent over 
the same period last year; and exports grew from month to month, up 
19.9 percent over the same period last year.  The economic 
efficiency of the municipality in the first quarter also improved at 
the same rate and local revenue increased by a big margin.  For the 
first time, value added by tertiary industry overtook that provided 
by secondary industry.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1147 GMT 9 
Apr 94) 

   Shortage Leads to Rising Office Rents in Beijing - According to 
reports from real estate agents, office rents in Beijing are the 
highest in the country, with monthly rents for first-class office 
premises set at $57 per square meter.  After rising 27 percent over 
the past nine months, rents are also likely to rise in the future. 
Beijing expects that 200 to 300 multinational companies will set up 
offices within the next two years.  By then, however, rents will 
have risen further because of the tight supply of offices.  As an 
increasing number of foreign banks and financial organizations are 
moving to the mainland, it is believed that commercial property 
prices will rise by 15 to 20 percent this year.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 
26 Mar 94 p A12) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Yunnan To Emphasize Economic 
Relations With Southeast Asia -- In an interview with a reporter 
from Hong Kong's TA KUNG PAO, Yunnan Governor He Zhiqiang said that 
the province will pursue an opening up policy emphasizing relations 
with Southeast Asia.  He noted that despite a late start, Yunnan has 
now assumed a "leading position" in opening to the outside world. 
With over 4,000 km of borders, Yunnan has enjoyed healthy 
development of border trade with Southeast Asia and is currently 
working to expand it.  Yunnan now has over 800 foreign-invested 
enterprises, of which 80 percent are associated with Hong Kong, 
Taiwan, and Macao.  Noting that Yunnan has certain disadvantages in 
utilizing foreign investment compared with coastal regions, he 
pointed out that the province will educate cadres to expand the 
scope of opening up.  He also said that Yunnan will put money into 
improving basic infrastructure such as roads and railroads.  When 
asked about narcotics trafficking, he pointed out that this is an 
international problem and is not necessarily linked to Yunnan's 
opening up.  However, Yunnan will continue its counternarcotics 
effort.  (Kunming YUNNAN RIBAO 3 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Foreign Investors Wary of Value-Added Land Tax - Detailed 
regulations on the implementation of China's Value-Added Land Law 
will be announced soon, but some foreign investors and economic 
experts have pointed out that there are irregularities in the 
legislation, and investor confidence will be affected if these are 
not corrected.  When the Provisional Regulations on the 
Implementation of the Value-Added Land Law were promulgated at the 
beginning of this year, foreign investors reacted strongly and 
pointed out that the tax rates were too high.  Viewing different 
situations in different localities, the central government will 
announce detailed implementation regulations soon, but the results 
remain to be seen.  Many foreign investors say that the mainland 
authorities did not carry out adequate research or receive enough 
recommendations before legislation was enacted, causing foreign 
investors to worry as they drew up long-term investment plans.  They 
hope that the central government will avoid hastily promulgating the 
"provisional regulations," because this will cause foreign investors 
to lose confidence in the authority of the law.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE 0943 GMT 10 Apr 94) 

   Guangzhou's Six Measures To Increase Utilization of Foreign 
Capital - Guangzhou will embark on a campaign to attract more 
international capital, especially from major consortia in Hong Kong, 
Macao, Taiwan, and other countries.  The measures to be taken 
include encouraging foreign investors to engage in the development 
of basic industries and urban capital construction, involving such 
projects as power plants, steel mills, ethylene and polypropylene 
plants, expressways, underground railways, light rail networks, port 
facilities, and a new international airport; encouraging foreign 
investors to help accelerate the development of service industries 
such as real estate, information services and consultancy, finance, 
and tourism; encouraging foreign investors to take part in the 
transformation of old enterprises, under a new policy where those 
helping to relocate and renovate enterprises in old urban districts 
will be entitled to develop real estate on their former sites; 
encouraging foreign investors to take part in the establishment of a 
large international development zone in southeast Guangzhou, 
occupying 219 square km; encouraging foreign investors to develop 
technologically advanced and export-oriented enterprises in several 
major fields, namely, electronics and information technology, new 
materials, biotechnology, energy efficiency and environmental 
protection, fine chemicals, and high-tech light industry; and 
encouraging the construction of bases for foreign-funded production 
of export commodities in light industry, which aims to expand 
exports of handicrafts, textiles, foodstuffs, chemicals, machinery, 
native products, animal products, and medical and health products. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 6 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Guangdong To Attract $10 Billion of Foreign Investment in 1994 - 
At a work conference on attracting foreign investment, Governor Zhu 
Senlin said that the province will absorb $10 billion in foreign 
investment in 1994, which will be used to transform old enterprises 
and upgrade products.  Foreign investors will be encouraged to 
develop projects in energy, transportation, communications, 
petroleum, chemicals, iron and steel, electronics, autos, high 
technology, and agricultural products earning foreign exchange. 
Last year, Guangdong accounted for 26 percent of the foreign capital 
invested in China.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 1 Apr 94 p 7) 

   Shenzhen's Exports, Investment, Foreign Trade Grow by 20 Percent 
- According to data supplied by the Shenzhen Statistics Bureau, 
major economic indexes in the first quarter of this year displayed 
growth rates in excess of 20 percent.  Total industrial output value 
was 13.912 billion yuan, up 33 percent over the same period last 
year, of which the output value of exports was 5.819 billion yuan, 
up 15 percent, and foreign-invested industrial output value was 
9.068 billion yuan, up 43 percent.  Investment in capital 
construction was over 3.1 billion yuan, a rise of nearly 42 percent. 
The total vdlume of retail sales was over 4.7 billion yuan, more 
than 40 percent higher than the same period last year, and the 
volume of foreign trade exceeded $3.35 billion, up more than 40 
percent, of which exports increased by 30 percent and imports by 
more than 50 percent.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1133 GMT 9 Apr 
94) 

   Xiamen Woos Foreign Capital for Designated Projects - Xiamen has 
decided to promote the participation of foreign investment in the 
following five projects this year: 1. the Xiayu Bonded Zone, which 
aims to attract multinational companies and trading firms to carry 
out entrepot and transit trade and set up bonded warehouses, 2. the 
Haicang Investment Zone, including port infrastructure and basic 
industries, 3. highway renovation, 4. investment in the 
transformation of old enterprises and township and town enterprises, 
and 5. high-tech and new-technology projects under the Torch 
program.  Delegations will be sent to Japan, Singapore, the 
Netherlands, Australia, and Hong Kong in April, May, and June to 
invite investment in these projects.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 9 Apr 
94 p 7) 

   Hong Kong Investors Pour $1 Billion Into Tianjin in 1993 - Last 
year, Hong Kong investors launched many investment projects in 
Tianjin, entailing a total investment of nearly $1 billion, 
according to an official from the Tianjin Economic Relations and 
Foreign Trade Committee.  Since 1978, when Tianjin first opened to 
foreign investors, the city has approved a total of 3,097 Hong Kong 
investment projects, involving a total investment of $3.69 billion, 
with $2.328 billion realized.  Forty percent of the Hong Kong 
investment projects in Tianjin are industrial ventures, with the 
international trade and real estate sectors accounting for 30 and 23 
percent respectively.  Hong Kong investors include well-known firms 
such as Cheung Kong, Hopewell Holdings, and New World Development. 
They are engaged in real estate development and the construction of 
power stations and warehouses.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 7 Apr 94 p B1) 

   China's Squeeze on Imports Affects Export Trade - Re-exports to 
China, Hong Kong's biggest market, grew 12.7 percent to HK$18.74 
billion in the first two months of 1994, down from 1993's growth of 
45.1 percent in the same period.  Enzio von Pfeil, an economist at 
S.G. Warburg Securities, said the figures indicated a cooling of the 
Chinese economy was taking place and cited the PRC's desire to 
reduce its trade deficit in 1994.  Re-exports to the United States 
rose 19.4 percent to HK$11.94 billion, and those to Japan rose 25.9 
percent to $3.52 billion.  Re-export trade with the UK also 
rebounded 30.3 percent to HK$1.88 billion.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA 
MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 14 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Imports of Capital Goods Rise in January - Hong Kong's imports of 
capital goods rose 22 percent by volume year on year with notable 
increases in office machines and electrical machinery.  The import 
volume of raw materials rose and semi-manufactures rose 37 percent 
compared with January 1993.  However, considerable decreases were 
recorded in domestic exports with footwear dropping 23 percent and 
textiles and related articles falling 16 percent.  Total exports 
increased 29 percent by volume while imports grew by 26 percent. 
(Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 13 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Steel Firm To Use Hong Kong as Base for Regional Expansion - Zhou 
Guanwu, a director of the Beijing-based Shoudu Iron and Steel 
Corporation, says that the corporation plans to establish a company 
in Hong Kong to expand its interests in Southeast Asia using the 
territory as a base.  After reviewing Shoudu's previous experience 
of investing abroad, Zhou said that the company will focus the next 
stage of its investment in Southeast Asia because of the region's 
exceptional growth.  Zhou said Shoudu will set up a holding company 
and will seek partners and investment projects appropriate to its 
characteristics and resources.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 15 Mar 94 p 
A2) 

   Contracts Signed With China During Berlin Mayor's Visit - Berlin 
Mayor Eberhard Diepgen recently led a trade delegation to Beijing, 
Shanghai, and Shenzhen.  The delegation signed 12 contracts with 
Chinese parties worth a total of 200 million Deutsch marks.  The 
projects are in traffic control, packaging, environmental 
protection, infrastructure, and high-speed railways.  (Hong Kong WEN 
WEI PO 12 Apr 94 p A3) 

   Hutchison To Manage Zhuhai Port - Zhuhai Port Investment Company 
and Li Ka-shing's Hutchison Whampoa Zhuhai Port Investment Company 
Limited officially have signed an agreement to establish a joint 
venture for the management of two berths at Zhuhai Port.  An equal 
share will be held by each partner.  The project is the first of its 
kind at Zhuhai Port, and its main function is to handle containers 
and bulk goods with a planned capacity of 950,000 tons a year. 
Construction of the facilities are under way and are expected to 
become operational in July this year.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 10 Apr 
94 p AS) 

   Hutchison Invests 2.5 Billion Yuan for Share of Port Project - 
The Shenzhen Port Buildings Headquarters has sold a 70-percent stake 
in the first and second stages of Yantian Port to Hutchison Whampoa 
for 2.5 billion yuan.  Construction of six berths has been 
completed, and 1.2 billion yuan has already been invested in the 
first phase of the port project.  When Yantian Port opened in 1992, 
Shenzhen invested more than 1 billion yuan in the first stage of the 
project with most of the capital provided by loans from the Japanese 
Government and Tokyo finance houses.  The six berths are projected 
to handle 200,000 twenty-foot equivalent units each year.  Shenzhen 
Port Building Headquarters will also sell rights to the second stage 
of the port (including land use rights) for 1.3 billion yuan.  The 
second stage will include three container berths and construction 
will begin when the first stage reaches 70 percent of its designed 
capacity.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 18 Mar 94 p A11) 

   Li Companies To Operate Power Stations in Guangdong's Nanhai - 
Cheung Kong (Holdings) Limited and Hutchison Whampoa Limited, both 
controlled by Li Ka-shing, have concluded an agreement with 
Guangdong's Nanhai Power Station A and the Nanhai Nantang Power 
Company Limited on the joint operation of four power plants.  Total 
investment in the initial projects will be $200 million, while 
$57.98 million will be spent on the second phase.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 29 Mar 94 p 25) 

   French Loan To Fund Water Supply Project in Xiamen - Fujian's 
Xiamen has obtained a loan from France to expand its drinking water 
supply capacity.  The city will use the loan to import water supply 
equipment from the Paris-based Degremont Group to enlarge the 
capacity of its water plants from 30 to 50 tons a day.  The $13.6 
million loan is the first of a batch of loans promised by the French 
Government this year.  An official at the French embassy said five 
or six other Chinese cities will also receive official loans from 
Paris to renovate their water supply systems.  Additional loans will 
be made for communications and paper manufacturing projects, the 
official said.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 9 Apr 94 p 3) 

   Japanese, ROK Banks Fund Steel Plant in Guangzhou - The Guangzhou 
International Trust and Investment Company Limited has agreed on 
terms for a $48 million loan to build the Zhujiang Iron and Steel 
Plant.  Banks involved in providing the syndicated loan include Dai- 
Ichi Kangyo Bank, Fuji Bank, Industrial Bank of Japan, Sakura Bank, 
Bank of Tokyo, First Finance Company Limited of South Korea, Daiwa 
Overseas Finance Company Limited, and Aomori Bank.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 23 Mar 94 p 5) 

   MING PAO Parent in Sichuan Light Rail System - CIM, the parent 
company of leading Hong Kong daily MING PAO, has signed a letter of 
intent with the Chinese Government to build a 550-million yuan 
elevated light rail system in Chongqing, Sichuan.  Mainland sources 
said a joint venture was expected in the coming months between CIM 
and the municipal government, but equity holdings in the new company 
had yet to be finalized.  Sources said an initial blueprint for the 
project envisaged 11 kilometers of track with an estimated 
construction cost of 50 million yuan per km.  (Hong Kong HONGKONG 
STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 14 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Chartered Bank To Open Representative in Chengdu - The Standard 
Chartered Bank has a favorable view of the development prospects for 
southwest China and plans to open a representative office in 
Chengdu, the bank's eighth office in mainland China, according to a 
Beijing-based executive of the bank.  Since its China desk was 
established in Hong Kong in 1986, Standard Chartered has lent $1.2 
billion to projects in China.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1135 GMT 
8 Apr 94) 

   Foreign Capital Sought To Construct Aviation Fuel Stations - The 
China Aviation Fuel Corporation has decided to introduce foreign 
capital this year to construct a number of aviation fuel supply 
bases.  The company plans to modernize or build almost 100 
facilities over five to seven years, which will require investment 
of 4 billion yuan.  However, lacking adequate capital, the company 
has signed letters of intent with British and French oil firms on 
the joint construction of fuel supply facilities in northern, 
eastern, central, and southern China.  In the near future, the 
company will build bases for imported oil in Tianjin, Shanghai, 
Guangzhou, and Beihai.  The project includes the construction of 
620,000 square meters of fuel transit stations and 294 km of 
pipelines.  On completion of these facilities, China's aviation fuel 
supply will grow to 3.4 million metric tons in 1995 and 7.5 million 
metric tons by the year 2000.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0723 GMT 
4 Apr 94) 

   Hong Kong-Based PRC Firms Invest in Shanghai-Nanjing Expressway - 
A consortium comprising Chinese-funded companies based in Hong Kong 
and led by the Bank of China Group will invest 6.2 billion yuan to 
build an expressway between Shanghai and Nanjing.  An unidentified 
company from Southeast Asia will have a 40-percent holding.  Since 
construction began in 1992, Jiangsu Province has invested 1.8 
billion yuan in the project.  Members of the consortium include the 
Bank of China Group, China Travel Service (Hong Kong) Limited, and 
China Resources Limited, who, together with the foreign partner, 
will form the Jiangsu Nanjing-Shanghai Expressway Construction 
Company.  The operational term will be 20 years from the date of 
completion.  There are 360 bridges along the Jiangsu section of the 
Nanjing-Shanghai expressway, and a total of 17 construction teams 
are involved in the project.  The expressway is expected to open in 
mid-1996.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 21 Mar 94 p A10) 

   Pacific Concord To Invest 6 Billion Yuan in Retail Sector, 
Housing - Hong Kong's Pacific Concord Holdings Limited will have 
invested 6 billion yuan in mainland China by the end of 1997 and is 
set to far exceed its original plan to set up a chain of 30 
department stores.  Chang Hung, the group's director in Beijing, 
said that this was in accordance with the present development of the 
group's business.  Chang also said that the firm's Concord Aoguang 
Commercial Building in Beijing will be ready for leasing at the end 
of June.  Concord invested almost 400 million yuan in the complex, 
which will provide 28,000 square meters of floor space.  By 1997, 
the Concord Commercial Town in the downtown area of Wangfujing will 
be completed.  It will have 100,000 square meters of floor space and 
will contain the third department store set up by Pacific Concord in 
Beijing.  Pacific Concord has run the joint venture Lei Meng-Concord 
Department Store in Beijing since 1991 and experience gained from 
this is being used in the operation of six department stores in 
Chengdu, Xian, Shanghai, Ningbo, and Xiamen.  The company plans to 
set up more stores in the downtown areas of other major cities.  At 
present, large malls funded by Pacific Concord are under 
construction in Shenzhen and Zhuhai.  In addition, the group has 
real estate projects in Shanghai, Suzhou, Shenzhen, Zhuhai, 
Guangzhou, Shenyang, Dalian, Chengdu, and Wuhan.  The group is also 
constructing office buildings and apartments in Jiuxianqiao in the 
eastern suburbs of Beijing, involving an investment of 400 million 
yuan.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 Apr 94 p B5) 

   Japanese Firm To Supply Coal Handling Equipment - The Tomen 
Corporation of Japan has signed a $96 million contract with the 
China National Technical Import and Export Corporation to supply 
equipment for a coal terminal in Qinhuangdao, Hebei.  The equipment 
includes dump trucks, ship loaders, and computer control systems for 
the Fourth Coal Terminal, a key construction project incorporated in 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan.  The equipment will be manufactured by 
Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and financing will come from the 
Japanese Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund.  The port plans to 
expand capacity from the current 60 million tons to 90 million tons 
in 1996.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 7 Apr 94 p 2) 

   ELF Aquitaine Invests in Chemicals, Pharmaceutical Sectors - Elf 
Aquitaine, France's biggest investor in China, is poised to 
strengthen its presence in the oil, chemical, and pharmaceutical 
sectors by launching joint ventures with Chinese partners.  Michel 
Labie, Elf's representative in China, said the company's biggest 
global investments will be in China "in the next few years," adding 
that this was "the strategy of our group." 

   Atochem, the chemicals division of Elf, has been studying a 
proposal for a $2.1 billion joint-venture refinery in Jinshan, 
Shanghai.  Elf is set to take a 70-percent stake and the Shanghai 
municipal government and Shanghai Petrochemical Co. Ltd will hold 
the balance.  The joint venture would be the biggest refinery in 
China, with a capacity of 8 million tons.  A feasibility study is 
expected to be completed in July, which will then be handed over to 
the State Planning Commission for approval.  In addition, Sanofi, 
Elf's pharmaceutical division, is negotiating with a Shanghai 
pharmaceutical factory to set up a $20 million joint venture in the 
Pudong New Area.  An agreement is expected to be signed in October. 
In 1993, Elf companies had sales of $295 million in China, up from 
$240 million in 1992.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 10-16 
Apr 94 p 8) 

   Singapore Firm Invests in Suzhou Tourism Area - The Suzhou Panmen 
Tourist Development Company and Singapore's Landmark Pte (Private) 
Limited are cooperating to develop the Panmen tourist area.  The 
first phase of the project involves a 600 million yuan investment, 
and the tourist area covers 23.3 hectares.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 1149 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   Merrill Lynch, Sanyo Invest in Anhui - Six international 
companies including Italy's Meloni, Japan's Sanyo, Hong Kong's 
Allied Group, and Merrill Lynch from the United States are investing 
in Anhui.  Meloni plans to build a washing machine factory in 
cooperation with the Hefei Meiling Company, involving a total 
investment of $29.8 million.  The factory will turn out 300,000 
machines with an annual output value of 1.25 billion yuan.  A number 
of Japanese companies led by Sanyo have decided to set up a plant 
with the Hefei Washing Machine Factory, which will produce automatic 
"intelligent" washing machines.  The project, which involves a total 
investment of $13 million (not including the factory building and 
technology), will produce 400,000 machines each year, with an output 
value of 1.2 billion yuan.  Meanwhile, Merrill Lynch, one of the 
largest securities companies in the world, has signed an agreement 
with Anhui's power, energy, and communications departments 
concerning direct investment of up to $5 billion.  (Hong Kong WEN 
WEI PO 26 Mar 94 p A8) 

   Sino-UK Telecommunications Firm To Increase Output - According to 
Simon Roper, managing director of Shanghai International Digital 
Telephone Equipment Company Limited (SIDTEC), a Sino-British joint 
venture, the firm's annual output will reach 300,000 lines when it 
expands to a new plant in the Jinqiao Export Processing Zone in the 
Pudong New Area at the end of this year.  Roper said that the 
company, established in 1989 with an initial investment of $10 
million, would continue to upgrade technology and localize the 
supply of materials.  In August 1993, SIDTEC became China's first 
foreign-funded joint venture to pass ISO9000 quality appraisal and 
in November received its BSI quality certificate from the UK. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 3-9 Apr 94 p 4) 

   Volkswagen, U.S. Technology Firm To Invest in Hainan - 
Volkswagen's representative in China recently signed a contract in 
Haikou to invest 120 million yuan to set up a plant in the Haikou 
Bonded Zone to manufacture high-performance autos.  Aptronix, a 
leading U.S. company in the fuzzy technology sector, also plans to 
set up a joint venture in the zone and invest 200 million yuan to 
produce fuzzy logic electronic controls.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 0826 GMT 8 Apr 94) 

   Fujian Company Provides Labor Services Overseas - Since its 
establishment in 1989, the Fujian Company for Cooperation in 
Communications and Labor Service With Foreign Countries has 
established commercial relations with Singapore, Japan, the United 
States, Thailand, Canada, Cambodia, Papua New Guinea, Taiwan, and 
Hong Kong.  This company has opened up markets in Hong Kong, 
Singapore, and Japan and has supplied 3,000 seamen, forming a 
complete organizational and management system.  Since 1990, the 
company has cooperated with the relevant department in Taiwan to 
send 500 fishermen to Taiwan each year to operate in Singapore, 
Mauritius, and Brazil.  The company has also contracted for marine 
services at the new airport in Macao.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0922 GMT 1 Apr 94) 

   Taiwan:  KMT-Run Enterprise To Build Power Plant in Indonesia - 
Yueh Sheng Chang Corporation, a KMT (Kuomintang)-run enterprise, 
plans to cooperate with a Japanese company to build a thermal power 
plant in Java, Indonesia.  The National China Petroleum Corporation 
of Taiwan also plans to cooperate with Indonesia to lay 100 
kilometers of pipeline from Musi to Dumai in Sumatra.  Indonesia 
will pay for its investment with oil exported to Taiwan.  The amount 
of investment for the two projects will be about $200 million each. 
An official in charge of Taiwan's KMT-run enterprises said further 
negotiations are necessary before a final decision can be made. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 4 Apr 94 p 2) 

   1993 Overseas Investment Increases 41.7 Percent Over Previous 
Year - According to the Ministry of Economic Affairs, Taiwan's 1993 
direct overseas investment was $2.4 billion, an increase of 41.7 
percent increase over the 1992 level. This was the first rise after 
three consecutive years of decline.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 31 
Mar 94 p 2) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Average Wages for Workers Reported - According to a 
Korean Development Institute study, North Korean workers' wages are 
not as low as generally believed.  Using 1990 as a standard year, 
the study shows that a North Korean worker's marginal productivity 
salary was $1,046 a year or $87 a month.  However, the actual wage 
standard set for each worker was 1.7 percent higher; it was, and 
still is, $150 per month.  (Seoul HANGUK ILBO 26 March 94 p 8) 

   DPRK Obtains Foreign Currency Through 'Foreign Exchange Shops' - 
North Korea has been operating "foreign exchange shops" to obtain 
foreign currency from foreigners and North Koreans returning from 
overseas.  There are about 20 such shops in Pyongyang alone, as well 
as others in cities such as Nampo and Kaesong.  Most of the goods 
sold in the shops are imported from Japan, Russia, Hong Kong, and 
China, while domestic products, such as cigarettes and liquor, 
account for only about 10 percent of the merchandise.  To make 
purchases at the shops, North Koreans are required to use vouchers 
bought with foreign currency ($1 is equivalent to 2.15 won in 
vouchers).  (Seoul NAEWOE TONGSIN 17 Feb 94 pp E1-E3) 

   Worsening Inflation in North Korea Reported - Inflation is 
reportedly becoming a "serious problem" for North Korea.  The 
currently "severe inflation" was caused by wage increases and the 
budget deficit that resulted from the "double price system" for 
grain.    Prices of industrial and agricultural products (except for 
rice) have increased by 300-400 percent, bringing about higher 
prices at state-run stores.  Egg and bread prices rose from 1 won to 
3.5 won and from 1 won to 2 won, respectively. 

   Money circulation has reportedly increased since 1992, following 
a 43.4- percent wage increase for laborers, technicians, and office 
workers, a 50.7-percent increase in social security benefits, a 33- 
percent increase in student scholarships, and 25.2-percent and 44.8- 
percent increases in the government's purchase prices for rice and 
corn.  Before 1992, the government used to pay 0.6 won for 1 kg of 
rice, but it is currently paying 0.82 won per kilo.  In spite of 
purchase price increases since 1992, the government has kept the 
official sale price for rice at 0.08 won per kilo.  (Seoul NAEWOE 
TONGSIN 3 Mar 94 pp E1-E2) 

        SOUTH KOREA: FEATURE: Research Institutes Get High-Tech Help 
  From MIT, Stanford - ,SUMMARY:  The ROK press recently reported on 
        high-tech cooperation between ROK government-funded research 
          institutes and U.S. universities.  In one instance, a U.S. 
      university donated plasma research equipment to a ROK research 
  institute, which will incorporate it in a plasma research facility 
    under construction.  In another case, a ROK institute and a U.S. 
       university have cooperated on developing a computer operating 
                                                             system. 

             According to the 23 February HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUM, the 
      Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) has donated plasma 
      research equipment to the Korea Research Institute of Stanford 
   Science (KRISS).  The equipment includes high-temperasture plasma 
    containment and heat testing equipment.  This equipment is being 
          installed in a research facility, which will begin initial 
  operations at the end of this year and enter full-scale use in the 
        beginning of 1995.  The Paper reported that KRISS will spend 
 approximately 10 billion won (12.5 million) to set up the facility, 
which will be one of the two largest basic science research 
installations in South Korea (the other is a radiation accelerator 
under construction at Pohang Institute of Science and Technology, or 
POSTECH). 

   HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUM noted that KRISS has "completely 
reconstructed" the core part of the plasma generating equipment it 
received from MIT and renamed it TARA.  (A captioned photo 
accompanying the article shows the device, which has three distinct 
parts, including a 2.5-meter high plasma stabilizer section, a 
plasma containment section, and a high-intensity magnetic field 
generator section.)  The 27-meter long TARA will be housed in a 
subsidiary facility along with a 9-megawatt, large-capacity 
electrical generator, and radio heating equipment.  The overall 
facility will also have high-tech diagnostic equipment that can 
measure the physical characteristics of high-temperature plasmas. 
The paper observed that the installation work seems to be 20 percent 
complete.  Things are expected to progress quickly as domestically 
produced parts are brought in, starting in June.  When the facility 
goes into service, it will mark the beginning of an era of "full- 
scale research to realize nuclear fusion," the "peaceful application 
of hydrogen bomb technology," according to the paper.  The facility 
will not only lead to basic research about plasma production and 
containment, but also to developments in peripheral technologies, 
such as ultra-high vacuums, high-intensity magnetic fields, ultra- 
high temperatures, ultra-high frequencies, and development of new 
heat-resistant materials. 

   The 22 February MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported another instance of 
cooperation between a ROK research institute and a U.S. university. 
According to the paper, the Electronics and Telecommunications 
Research Institute (ETRI) and Stanford University have jointly 
developed an operating system for an "indigenous" ROK multimedia 
workstation.  The cooperative effort between the university and 
ETRI, which the paper reported as affiliated with the Communications 
Ministry, began in 1991 and will run until this July.  The operating 
system the two developed--named Cosmos--is now undergoing testing. 
Currently ETRI technical staff are receiving special technical 
training, including performance test training, at Stanford.  MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN noted that, as soon as this is complete, the related 
technologies will be "transferred" to Samsung Electronics, Goldstar, 
Hyundai Electronics, and Daewoo Telecom.  These four companies 
cooperated with ETRI to develop a multimedia workstation, named 
Combi, which they plan to start commercializing next year.  They 
have also developed a board with both audio and video capabilities 
for use with the Cosmos operating system.  It is expected that the 
Combi workstation will use B-ISDN (broad-band integrated services 
digital network) terminals, which the Communications Ministry is 
promoting. 

   On 8 April, the Communications Ministry announced the development 
of Combi, a "multimedia personal computer," which was "developed in 
South Korea," according to a 10 April YONHAP item.  YONHAP reported 
that the computer is the product of cooperation by ETRI and the four 
firms mentioned above, as well as the Korea Computer Research 
Association.  The press service commented that South Korea "lacked" 
multimedia software and hardware, and that its multimedia 
applications were at "the beginning stage.  The Combi team will try 
to develop a multimedia workstation by June 1994, YONHAP noted.  It 
made no mention of the operating system for the multimedia 
workstation that ETRI has developed "in cooperation with" Stanford. 
It noted that the government will contribute 11.5 billion won 
($14.375 million) and the companies 7.8 billion won ($9.75 million) 
to the workstation effort. 

   FEATURE:  New Government Initiatives To Support Commercial S and 
T - SUMMARY:  Recent Seoul newspapers reported several ROK 
government initiatives to improve technical cooperation between 
South Korean research institutes, companies, and universities, and 
to help these facilities get better access to foreign technology. 
The government will reform its own R and D structure by eliminating 
barriers to cooperation between agencies and by making their 
research results commercially available.  Measures are also being 
enacted to facilitate "indirect" acquisition of foreign technology 
as a substitute for licensing and to build up a "technological 
infrastructure" through various subsidies, including aid to 
universities cooperating with industry.  Underlying the enterprise 
are efforts to improve control and dissemination of technological 
data. 

   The ROK Government is behind new measures to stimulate commercial 
S and T development by improving the distribution of technical data 
and by creating synergistic structures where researchers of 
different affiliations meet to share ideas and train new personnel, 
according to Seoul newspaper reports.  Included among these is a 
plan reported in the 16 March CHONJA SINMUN for the S and T Policy 
Management Research Institute to enact a "System of National S and T 
Reform" that will enable South Korea to build a "technology 
development strategy for the new economy" by revising the S and T 
budget system, "pooling" research, and setting up an "R and D 
commercial product market." 

   The plan would "transform the national R and D project structure, 
which at present is conducted by each agency separately, into three 
types:  state-run projects of the top-down style, balanced state-run 
projects that combine top-down and bottom-up styles, and basic 
state-run projects of the bottom-up style."  CHONJA SINMUN explained 
that this would involve reversing the usual procedure of allotting a 
general S and T budget and deciding later on particular programs. 
The plan reportedly calls for a greater amount of integration and 
control of the agencies involved in R and D, to include evaluating 
and providing information on products that result from government 
research through an "R and D product market."  It would also 
establish a "National Agency for Technology Management" to maintain 
consistent S and T policies, eliminate duplication of effort, and 
stop interagency rivalry. 

   In addition, the 16 March CHONJA SINMUN reported the ROK 
Government is enacting measures to import more foreign technology by 
standardizing laws on technology imports, giving tax breaks to firms 
importing certain types of technology, and relaxing restrictions on 
foreign capital.  The government will also take steps to eliminate 
"overdependence" by ROK companies on licensed technology and put 
more effort instead into "indirect technology transfers through 
direct investment."  The newspaper went on to report the substance 
of a study by the Korea Institute for International Economic Policy 
(KIEP) recommending that government and industry work together to 
"manage the whole technology transfer process" by building a 
database of information on technology transfer, organizing data 
distribution systems, and creating specialized "service agencies" 
that supply technology transfer data.  KIEP, a government think tank 
whose recommendations often impact on policy, cautioned that without 
an effective technology import plan it would be difficult for South 
Korea to continue selling products in advanced countries.  The 
government must also become better at "managing information so that 
effective technology transfer can be possible." 

   The 17 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN also reported that the ROK 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) has drafted a "Law 
on the Formation of an Industrial Technology Base" to go into effect 
later this year. The proposed legislation is designed to build up 
the country's "technological infrastructure" by nurturing new 
technology, training technical personnel, modernizing research 
facilities, building a data distribution network, and expanding 
"technical cooperation" through a support base of financial 
subsidies and tax incentives.  MOTIE's plan would have technical 
data held in state-run labs, private research institutes, and 
companies entered into a database managed by the Korea Institute of 
Industry and Technology Information for distribution to technology 
consumers (see related article on South Korean databases in this 
issue of Pacific Rim Economic Review).  It would also link industry 
and academia into a "cooperative structure" by forming "combined 
research centers" at all of South Korea's major universities. 

   According to the newspaper, such centers are already being set up 
at Yonsei and Korea Universities, Pohang Engineering college, and 
the Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology.  The present 
legislation would provide government support for the centers, and 
beginning next year expand them to all major ROK universities. 
MOTIE would also establish an "industrial technology university" and 
develop training programs for use in universities and research 
institutes.  In what is the same or a related development, the 9 
March CHONJA SINMUN reported that the ROK's Ministry of Education is 
providing 200 billion won ($250 million) to support institutions 
designated "national policy universities" by virtue of their 
willingness to pursue joint research with South Korean companies. 
The ministry originally intended to limit the recipients to four, 
but is now negotiating with the Economic Planning Board to expand 
that number, the paper stated. 

   FEATURE:  Developments in Database Industry Reported - SUMMARY: 
Major changes are occurring in South Korea's database industry, in 
response to government wishes to expand access to foreign and 
domestic commercial technology, the Seoul press reported.  The Korea 
Institute of Industry and Technology Information, which runs the 
ROK's largest database of S and T information, is upgrading and 
systematizing its network to improve efficiency, and has signed new 
access agreements with foreign database companies to support 
domestic R and D.  In addition, the Korea Database Promotion Center 
has unveiled a multi-million dollar plan to promote the database 
industry on three fronts. 

   South Korea's database (DB) industry is getting a boost from 
initiatives recently taken by ROK government and quasi-official 
institutions, according to Seoul press reports.  The 19 March CHONJA 
SINMUN reported that the Korea Institute of Industry and Technology 
Information (KINITI) will spend 6 billion won ($7.5 million) 
upgrading its KINITI-IR (Information Retrieval) system, a nationwide 
network that provides on-line access to "data on advanced industrial 
technology" stored in foreign and domestic DB's.  The newspaper 
reported the current system, which is based on a 32MB IBM 3090-150 
computer, has "limited" ability to process technical data and 
satisfy users' demands for information.  It will be replaced by a 
64MB IBM 912-411 host computer, 45MB IBM 3390-A28 disk equipment, 
and 64K BPS (bits per second) IBM 3745-210 communications equipment. 
The new installation will make the system "three times faster," use 
better search procedures, and provide picture data, CHONJA SINMUN 
said. 

   The October 1993 DATABASE WORLD explained that KINITI's IR data 
network was put into operation when KINITI was founded in 1991. 
Designed and built by the institute itself, the system consists of a 
computer, databases, and communications equipment in Seoul connected 
to "local information centers" in the ROK's 10 most important 
cities.  The latter act as "nodes" linking the system to individual 
subscribers.  The network makes available "in a systematic fashion 
industrial, scientific, and technological information" from foreign 
and domestic sources "needed by South Korean industry for R and D 
and technical development." 

   According to the magazine, the system offers information from 
eight foreign databases, including INSP (electricity, electronics, 
physics, computers, information science, control engineering), PA92 
(world patents), COMP (applied and general engineering), ISMC 
(machine and production engineering), FSTA (foods), META 
(metallurgy), NTIS (U.S. government-supported research reports in 
science, technology, and social sciences), and BIOT (life science, 
genetic engineering, biochemistry).  Some 18 million items of 
information from foreign sources were stored in the system as of 
August 1993 and 800,000 more are added annually.  Patents-related 
data accounted for 9.6 million or 58 percent of the items stored. 
KINITI's IR allows subscribers to access 15 domestic DB's, which as 
of August 1993 held 1.3 million items.  Two more domestic databases 
on commerce and trade, and "R and D data" were scheduled to be added 
at the end of 1993, the magazine noted. 

   In a related development, the 11 March CHONJA SINMUN reported 
that KINITI signed agreements with two more international DB 
services--the Scientific Technical Information Network (STN) and the 
Chemical Abstracts Service.  STN was reported to be operated by 
U.S., German, and Japanese companies, and to cover more than 160 
scientific and technological fields.  According to the newspaper, 
ROK database users who had been paying high prices for these 
services will now be able to obtain "high-quality S and T data" 
cheaply.  CHONJA SINMUN also reported on 21 March that in May, South 
Korean subscribers to the Korea Research Computer Network, a system 
run by the Ministry of Science and Technology's Systems Engineering 
Research Institute (SERI), will have access to Europe Net which 
offers R and D data from more than 20 European countries.  The 
network with 81 institutional subscribers (compared with 40 a year 
ago), is linked to INTERNET, an international computer network with 
some 2 million customers.  One SERI official reportedly called the 
system a "magic box" for South Korean S and T development. 

   The 21 March CHONJA SINMUN also reported the Korea Database 
Promotion Center's (DPC's) announced plans to build a foundation for 
developing the domestic DB industry by more effectively managing 
data from public sources and by systematizing data distribution 
routes.  The plan, with a budget of 1.17 billion won ($146 million), 
divides the database industry into three sub-fields:  government- 
funded databases, the general database industry, and "public" 
databases.  The first of these will benefit by a DPC-hosted seminar 
in June to give private companies an opportunity to express their 
views on how government database policies should develop, and by a 
second international database show held in Seoul between 12-15 
September.  DPC will also form, disseminate, and encourage use of 
standards relating to fees, classification techniques, and search 
commands. 

   For the general database industry, DPC will promote cooperation 
with overseas DB companies in order to observe trends in the foreign 
database industry and secure channels for exchange.  DPC has 
selected England's Computer Research Association, Japan's Database 
Industry Promotion Society, and the United States' Bruno Blenheim as 
the foreign institutions with which it will cooperate.  DPC's plans 
for the "public" DB industry involve maintaining close relations 
with those businesses receiving government support for database 
development as provided for in the Ministry of Communications' 1993 
policy on DB promotion, CHONJA SINMUN reported. 

   FEATURE:  New ROK 'Foundation' Aims at U.S. High-Tech - SUMMARY: 
The "ROK-U.S. Industrial Technology Cooperation Foundation" will 
begin operating in April with joint funding from the South Korean 
Government and businesses, according to the ROK press.  The 
foundation's reported purpose is to reduce technological dependence 
on Japan through greater acquisition of U.S. technology by small and 
medium businesses.  Some nine high-tech fields have been targeted. 

   In April, the South Korean Government and large conglomerates 
will begin joint funding of an ROK-U.S. Industrial Technology 
Cooperation Foundation, aiming at "transfering U.S. technology to 
South Korean small and medium businesses" (SMB's), the 17 March 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  Half of the foundation's 1994 
operating budget of $4 million will be paid by its parent 
organization, the Federation of Korean Industries, and the balance 
by the Korea Traders Association and the ROK Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the newspaper stated.  By 1997, the 
annual budget reportedly will have grown to $20 million. 

   According to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, the new foundation will 
support SMB's developing technology for semiconductors, computers, 
machine tools, aircraft, communications, medical and environmental 
equipment, auto parts, and "development facilities."  South Korean 
SMB's which invest in the United States will be eligible for up to 
$500,000 in low interest loans, while those forming joint ventures 
with U.S. firms in South Korea can receive up to $300,000. 

   The 17 March CHONJA SINMUN described the foundation as a "private 
organization" formed last February under the leadership of the 
Federation of Korean Industries, according to a plan agreed upon by 
the ROK Commerce Minister and the U.S. Secretary of Commerce in 
April 1993 for increased technological "cooperation" between the two 
countries.  The newspaper cited a federation source as saying, "The 
foundation's activities will have the effect of reducing South 
Korea's technological dependence on Japan by absorbing U.S. 
technology, while reducing the trade friction that recently has been 
rising between the ROK and the United States." 

   FEATURE:  South Korea Responds to 'Technical Trade Barriers' - 
SUMMARY:  Advanced countries allegedly are using exceptions in the 
GATT relating to environment and safety as a means of excluding ROK 
exports, according to two Seoul press reports.  South Korea's Trade 
Ministry is responding by devising quality standards that will 
enable exporters to prepare for these "technical barriers" in 
advance, and is cooperating with other agencies to maintain a 
database on technical standards by product and country. 

   The South Korean Government's Industrial Advancement 
Administration (IAA) has concluded that "advanced countries" are 
using exceptions in the General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs 
(GATT) involving environment and safety to strengthen their 
"technical barriers" to ROK products, the 11 March CHONJA SINMUN 
reported.  Identified by the newspaper as "hidden barriers" that 
focus on particular technologies, both CHONJA SINMUN and the 11 
March HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN (HKS) accused the United States, Japan, 
and other countries of exploiting the allegedly harmful effects of 
these technologies to exclude ROK products. 

   As an example, HKS cited a GATT notification prohibiting use of a 
"cancer-causing" dye in ROK textiles imported into Germany, and the 
use of PCP as a preservative.  The newspaper also complained about a 
contradictory requirement that plastic materials imported by Denmark 
and other European countries pass a non-combustibility test, but 
that a key material used to retard flammability in the products 
cannot be used for environmental reasons.  Similarly, the paper 
stated the United States is considering banning all 
chlorofluorocarbons products, while Canada and Japan may set limits 
on radiation emitted by portable communications equipment. 

   To combat these barriers, the IAA (part of the ROK Ministry of 
Trade, Industry, and Energy) is developing a comprehensive plan that 
includes establishing and disseminating nationwide standards for 
export products and building a database of regulations by product 
and individual country, CHONJA SINMUN reported.  For goods with a 
high export ratio, the South Korean Government will enact quality 
standards to be followed by domestic industries based on the 
standards of the main importing countries.  Individual companies 
will monitor their compliance with these standards themselves.  For 
newly developed products which "have a high probability of causing 
bodily harm," separate safety standards will be created and the 
products will be subject to government inspection, according to HKS. 

   CHONJA SINMUN reported that the ROK Government will build a 
database in the first half of 1994 on "trade and technology 
barriers" by country and product and make this information available 
to domestic exporters.  Finally, the Korea Trade Promotion 
Corporation will join with government in maintaining a system that 
tracks "technical barriers" set by each country.  A committee will 
be established within the IAA to form "countermeasures" that reduce 
the effect of these barriers. 

   Samsung Electronics Indigenizes Several Technologies - Samsung 
Electronics has developed an indigenous point-of-sale (POS) terminal 
after 16 months of research and an investment of 2 billion won ($2.5 
million).  All parts for the terminal--except for the central 
processing unit--were developed indigenously.  Prior to this, ROK 
firms had not developed a print mechanism or POS application 
software indigenously, but rather had to contract with Japan to 
obtain it.  Samsung's mechanism can print out three 24-character 
lines per second, which is faster than the competing Japanese-made 
product.  Having the ability to produce the software domestically 
will allow firms to develop programs suited to the domestic 
environment and to easily adjust programs as conditions change. 
(Seoul CHONJA SINMUN 8 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Samsung Electronics has also developed a thin-film transistor 
liquid-crystal display (TFT-LCD) for use in camcorders.  This is 
expected to raise the competitive ability of ROK camcorder 
producers, which previously depended completely on imported TFT- 
LCD's.  Samsung began its research on the product in 1991, investing 
500 million won ($625,000) in the project.  The company developed 
the TFT-LCD's using a high-temperature complementary metal oxide 
semiconductor process, which has also been used in Japan and 
England.  Samsung plans to begin full production in the second half 
of 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Mar 94 p 21) 

   Competition for Color Printer Market Expected To Heat Up - 
Hyundai Electronics and Lucky-Canon have joined Samsung-Hewlett 
Packard (S-HP) in the color printer market.  In addition, expert 
printer companies Kyuniks Computer and Sambo Computer will be 
marketing new color printer products in the first half of this year. 
At the same time, new printers have come on the market and their 
price range has dropped, from between 1 and 3 million won ($1,250- 
3,750) to between 400,000 and 800,000 won ($500-1,000). 

   S-HP's Deskjet 505K printer accounts for most of the low-price 
printer market, and its 400,000 won ($500) price is similar to 
black-and-white dot matrix printers.  S-HP is working to bring in 
the Deskjet 1200C, but thus far has not been allowed to import it. 
Hyundai Electronics began marketing its recently developed dot 
matrix printer in January and, after only one month, had supplied 
more than 100 machines.  The company plans to increase production 
and is working to improve the machine's capabilities.  Lucky-Canon's 
BJC-600 bubble jet printer is able to handle hangul, and is the 
company's answer to S-HP's Deskjet 505K.  Competition for sales is 
expected to heat up after this model hits the market.  Sambo 
Printer, the largest domestic printer supplier, has signed an 
agreement with Japan's Epson to bring in printers and equip them to 
handle hangul.  They plan to complete this and begin marketing the 
machine in the first half of this year.  In the same period, Kyuniks 
Computer plans to introduce a color printer that uses a Canon 
engine.  The ROK color printer market was very small through 1992, 
but in 1993 business increased, and 6,000 machines were produced 
each month.  Beginning in October 1993, this figure climbed to 
12,000-15,000.  This year, production is expected to reach 150,000 
machines.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Daewoo To Expand R and D Centers at Home, Abroad - Daewoo 
Automotive will expand its existing research institute in South 
Korea, and will set up other R and D centers in Germany, England, 
and the United States.  The firm will invest 190 billion won ($237.5 
million) through September to expand its existing research institute 
into a larger general research institute, adding 500 new employees 
to the current staff of 1,300.  In Germany, Daewoo will set up an 
auto technology center to promote the internationalization of its R 
and D sector.  The center will employ 80 foreign technicians and 80 
ROK technicians, and will be tasked with developing an indigenous 
model passenger car to be produced after 1996.  Daewoo has already 
taken over IAD, a British automotive engineering firm, and is 
considering setting up automotive research centers in Detroit and 
Los Angeles in the United States.  By setting up centers like these, 
Daewoo hopes to strengthen its development of advanced technologies 
that advanced auto makers "dislike" transferring to other firms, as 
well as strengthen the technical cooperation between its overseas R 
and D centers.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Feb 94 p 11) 

   Statistics for First Quarter Exports Reported - ROK exports 
(based on customs clearance) reached $7.63 billion in March, while 
imports totaled $8.3 billion, according to the Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy.  This resulted in a $665-million trade deficit 
for the month.  For the first quarter of this year, the total trade 
deficit was $2.57 billion, an increase of $793 million compared to 
the first quarter of 1993.  (Seoul YONHAP 0615 GMT 4 Apr 94) 

   In the same quarter, ROK car exports increased 10.1 percent over 
1993 levels, according to industry sources.  In March alone, car 
exports shot up 26.5 percent, following rises of 20.2 and 9.9 
percent in January and February, respectively, compared to the same 
periods the year before.  These increases come as a result of the 
economic recovery of the United States, which is a major market for 
ROK car exports.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 3 Apr 94 p 8) 

   KINITI To Promote Tech Transfers for Small Firms - The Korea 
Institute of Industry and Technology Information (KINITI) has set up 
a Technology Transaction Information Center to promote the 
introduction and exchange of technologies in and among smaller 
companies.  KINITI said it plans to raise 5.89 billion won ($7.363 
million) by 1997 to promote tech transfers.  The newly established 
center will gather information about new products and technologies 
that can be commercialized, and will provide the information to 
local companies via an on-line computer network.  (Seoul THE KOREA 
TIMES 2 Apr 94 p 8) 

   ROK-DPRK-China Shipping Route To Open in April - A Pusan-Chongjin 
shipping route linking North and South Korea will open around 10 
April.  The ROK shipping company Samson Shipping announced on 2 
April that it has finalized a joint-venture agreement with Xianhu 
Group, a company specializing in business with North Korea.  Xianhu 
is managed by an ethnic Korean living in Yanbian, China.  The new 
joint-venture--Sonho Shipping--will contract with third countries 
for 4,200-metric ton semi-container ships and transport cargo 
between China and the ROK via Chongjin.  Xianhu Group has exclusive 
rights to use Chongjin port under an agreement with DPRK 
authorities.  (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 3 Apr 94 p 11) 

   ROK Firms Receive Shipbuilding Orders From Hong Kong, Canada - 
Hanjin Heavy Industries has received an order to build four 15,000- 
metric ton ships in Shanghai.  The order, worth $100 million, was 
placed by Paraco, a Hong Kong firm.  However, the Shanghai Shipping 
Company, the second largest shipping company in China, is known to 
be the actual user.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 11) 

   Daewoo Shipbuilding has received an order from the Canada 
Maritime Company to build two 2,200-TEU container ships that can 
travel through frozen seas.  The order is worth $100 million.  The 
ships will be equipped with modern devices, including global 
positioning system navigators and pollution prevention devices. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Apr 94 p 11) 

   Firms Invest in Overseas Spinning Plants - The Kabul Spinning 
Company will increase its production capacity by building four more 
overseas plants.  These include a $24-million investment in Jiangsu, 
China (subject to PRC Government approval), a $15,000 investment in 
Tajikistan, a $15,000 investment in Pakistan, and possibly a plant 
in Alabama.  The Tajikistan plant will begin operating in the latter 
half of 1995.  Kabul is still reviewing its plans for the Pakistan 
plant and has just secured a plant site in Benton, Alabama.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Apr 94 p 10) 

   Taenong has begun operating its cotton spinning plant in Qingdao, 
China.  The company invested $19 million in the plant, which can 
produce cotton thread, linen, as well as finished garments.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 Apr 94 p 9) 
   Daewoo Gets Financing From Exim Bank for Overseas Plant - The 
Korea Export-Import Bank has approved an $80-million overseas 
investment fund loan for Daewoo to build a car factory in 
Uzbekistan.  The loan will carry an annual interest rate of 6.72 
percent and have a 10-year payback period.  The total budget for the 
joint venture, called UZ-Daewoo Motors, is $635 million.  Daewoo and 
Uzbekistan's Selcho Znash will each invest $100 million and borrow 
the remainder.  UZ-Daewoo Motors will produce 200,000 vehicles 
annually and export 78 percent of them to neighboring countries.  In 
Uzbekistan, the government has taken steps to boost the project, 
such as lowering various taxes for the joint venture.  (Seoul YONHAP 
0210 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   Hyundai Active in Saudi Power Plant Construction - Hyundai 
Engineering and Construction Co. has won an order to build an 
extension to the Tabuk Gas Turbine Power Plant II.  The Saudi 
Arabian Electric Power Authority placed the order for the turnkey 
project, which is worth $61 million.  The project will include 
installation of two 65-megawatt gas turbines.  Hyundai will begin 
the project this month and complete it in two years.  The company is 
also negotiating an order for a 110-km power cable project and two 
other orders worth $100 million from the same Saudi authority. 
(Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 14 Apr 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Joint Venture Brewery To Be Established 
- The Asia Pacific Brewery of Singapore and the Union of Myanmar 
Economic Holdings, Ltd. recently signed a memorandum of 
understanding to establish a $30-million brewery in Rangoon.  The 
plant, expected to be completed in 1996, will have an annual 
capacity of 45 million cans of beer.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 9 
Apr 94 p 47) 

   INDONESIA:  Cambodia To Use Palapa Satellite Transponder - P.T. 
Telkom Director Setyanto Sentosa stated that the Cambodian 
Government has leased a 30-channel Palapa B4 satellite transponder 
for television and radio broadcasts throughout the country. 
Cambodia's Posts and Telecommunications Minister So Khun predicts 
that the country will need more transponders in the coming years as 
the country continues to develop its telecommunications capability. 
(Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 5 Mar 94 p 1) 

   IPTN-Airbus Industrie Flight Test Agreement Signed - The European 
consortium Airbus Industrie has signed an agreement with Indonesia's 
aerospace industry IPTN to assist in all aspects of IPTN's N-250 
turbo prop aircraft flight test program.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 21 Mar 94 
p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Islamic Money Market Established - SUMMARY: 
Malaysia recently established an Islamic money market, becoming the 
first country with a "full-fledged" Islamic banking system.  Its 
success facilitates an "ambitious goal, a meaningful Malaysian role" 
in a future international Islamic banking system, according to 
recent Kuala Lumpur dailies. 

   The 21 March UTUSAN MALAYSIA and 22 March BERITA HARIAN reported 
that Malaysia established an Islamic money market in January 
becoming the first country with a "full-fledged" Islamic banking 
system.  The papers said this important milestone came when the 
Central Bank issued the first bonds based on Islamic principles. 
They are redeemable at par upon maturity or on demand at the Central 
Bank.  The borrower is not obliged to reward lenders for their 
benevolence but may do so.  Thus, the government has absolute 
discretion whether to reward bond holders--and if so, by how much, 
the papers said. 

   According to the 22 March BERITA HARIAN, Malaysia now has the 
three criteria required to have a comprehensive Islamic financial 
system--an Islamic interbank money market in Islamic financial 
instruments, Islamic interbank investments, and an Islamic interbank 
check-clearing system.  The latter element is somewhat limited. 
The paper also said that Bank Islam Malaysia Bhd. and other 
institutions offering interest-free banking can trade in Islamic 
financial instruments (such as the newly-issued government bonds) 
among themselves.  BERITA HARIAN also detailed the Islamic interbank 
investments, where one interest-free bank with surplus funds can 
invest in another that has a deficit.  The term for such investments 
ranges from overnight to one year (similar to a conventional money 
market), and the minimum investment is $20,000.  Profit-sharing 
ratios, generally determined by the Central Bank, are 70 percent for 
the provider of funds. 

   The 21 March UTUSAN MALAYSIA noted that at the end of January, 
barely a month after it was launched, the Islamic interbank money 
market reported a trading volume of $90 million.  The paper also 
stated that the Central Bank granted Bank Islam Malaysia Bhd. 
permission to operate an Islamic stock brokerage firm, thus paving 
the way for a domestic Islamic capital market. 

   Both UTUSAN MALAYSIA and BERITA HARIAN stated that the success of 
the Malaysian Islamic financial system has been recognized by many 
Islamic countries as a model.  Saudi Arabia and Sri Lanka have shown 
keen interest in studying the Malaysian system in order to implement 
a similar arrangement.  Within ASEAN, Malaysia has assisted Brunei, 
Indonesia, and the Philippines in establishing interest-free 
banking.  These papers noted that many Islamic countries would like 
to have an Islamic financial system, and some tried in the 1970s. 
The papers concluded that if infrastructure can be established 
between countries to link their Islamic banking systems, many 
countries will be able to participate. 

   PHILIPPINES:  International Consortium Seeks To Operate Bataan 
Nuclear Plant - A Malaysian-U.S. consortium has submitted a proposal 
to the Philippine Government to convert the $2.3 billion Bataan 
Nuclear Power Plant (BNPP) with a capacity of 600 MW, into a 1,890- 
MW power facility, on a 25-year build-operate-transfer arrangement. 
The consortium would raise $1.5 billion to cover such costs as 
installing the transmission lines, building the necessary 
infrastructure, establishing a natural gas vaporization plant, 
laying a gas pipeline, etc.  The conversion plan also calls for the 
plant to use pollution-free liquefied natural gas from Malaysia, and 
its output is to be sold to the National Power Corporation 
(Napocor).  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 20 Mar 94 p 7) 

   THAILAND:  Oil-Related Joint Venture in Vietnam Reported - The 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand and Charoen Phokphan plan to 
establish a $28-million oil-related venture with Saigon Petro.  The 
new company, PetroAsia (Saigon), will establish oil depots and 
terminals, a retail oil network, and a liquefied petroleum gas 
distribution and trading operation.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 12 Apr 94 
p 15) 

   First Quarter Rice Exports Reach 1.3 Million Tons - Thailand 
exported about 1.3 million tons of rice during the first three 
months of this year, compared to 960,000 tons during the same period 
last year.  The increase in exports should lead to an increase in 
the domestic rice price of $220 a ton.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand 
Network 0000 GMT 14 Apr) 

   Firms Form Consulting Company With Burmese State Agency - GCN 
Holdings Ltd, Siam Commercial Bank, and the Union of Myanmar 
Economic Holdings, Ltd. recently announced the formation of a new 
consulting company for investors wishing to explore business 
opportunities in Burma.  Thai investors own 30 percent of the new 
firm, called Myanmar Consultants (Thailand) Co. Ltd., while the 
Burmese partner owns the remainder.  (Bangkok THE NATION 8 Apr 94 p 
B2) 

   CP Group To Invest in Shanghai Industrial Park - The Charoen 
Phokphan Group plans to invest $400 million in an industrial park in 
Shanghai, and has identified three counties as possible sites- 
-Pudong, Songjiang, and Jiading.  The company has asked the governor 
of Shanghai to grant investment incentives similar to those offered 
in Pudong regardless of which county is selected.  Incentives in 
Pudong include a 15-percent corporate tax exemption for the first 
two years, a 50-percent tax reduction in the following three years, 
exemption from the 10-percent tax on profits transferred out of 
China, and exemption from import duty on machinery and equipment 
used in the project.  (Bangkok XING XIAN RIBAO 7 Apr 94 p 16) 

   Regional Banks' Loan Package to Refinery Company - Seven 
Singapore-based banks--Development Bank of Singapore, Citicorp 
Investment, Deutsche Bank (Asia Pacific), Dresdner (Southeast Asia), 
Fuji Bank Singapore, LTCB Merchant Bank Singapore, and Westpac 
Singapore--have joined 14 other banks and the International Finance 
Corporation (IFC) to arrange a $1.2 billion loan package for the 
Star Petroleum Refining Company.  The loans, with maturities from 10 
to 13 years, will be provided by the IFC and 58 financial 
institutions from Asia, Australia, Europe, the Middle East, and the 
United States.  The funds will finance the construction of Star's 
130,000 barrel-a-day refinery in Rayong Province.  (Singapore 
STRAITS TIMES 31 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Firm Signs Memorandum on Lao Hydropower Project - Siam United 
Services signed a memorandum with the Lao Government to construct 
the Nam Theun 1 hydropower project.  On 25 March the company was 
granted a concession from the Lao Government to build the Nam Theun 
1 hydropower project in Khammouan and Bolikhamsai Provinces.  The 
Lao Government will invest at least 30 percent of the total project 
value.  The Nam Theun 1-2 project is expected to be completed in the 
year 2000 and produce 400-1,400 megawatts for sale to Thailand, 
earning Laos about $136 million annually.  The hydropower project is 
seen as a solution to the water crisis in Thailand.  (Bangkok THE 
NATION 4 Apr 94 p B2) 

   Bank Reports Decline in Foreign Investment - Direct foreign 
investment in Thailand declined by 27.5 percent last year compared 
with 1992 as investors shifted to other countries they considered 
more attractive, a Bank of Thailand spokesman said.  Foreign 
investors pumped $1.56 billion into Thailand in 1993 compared with 
$2.15 billion the year before.  Net external borrowing in 1993 
dropped by 42.4 percent to $1.59 billion from $2.77 billion in 1992. 
Singapore, Japan, and Hong Kong were the main lenders to Thailand. 
Net investment in the Stock Exchange of Thailand increased sixfold, 
from $460.48 million in 1992 to $2.7 billion. (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 
6 Apr 94 p 24) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Export Processing Zones' Development Reviewed 
- SUMMARY:  There are five licensed EPZ's nationwide according to 
press reports.  Total investment amounts to $305.5 million. 
Investors from 25 countries have registered to build factories and 
invest in the EPZ's.  Only one firm has produced and exported 
products.  State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) 
Vice Chairman Lu Minh Chau said that no more EPZ's should be built. 

   The 16 March issue of THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that the 
SCCI recently held a conference in Ho Chi Minh City to review work, 
achievements on EPZ's. 

   There are five EPZ's in Vietnam.  Total investment capital of 
licensed projects including infrastructure projects, amounted to 
$305.5 million or 4.1 percent of the country's total foreign 
investment from 1988-1993.  Nearly 100 companies from 25 countries 
have registered to lease land at the EPZ's in Tan Thuan, Linh Trung, 
and Haiphong.  These projects will primarily produce or process 
sports equipment, electronic games, garments, bags, yarn, food and 
agricultural products.  Ground-breaking ceremonies were held for the 
Can Tho and Da Nang EPZ's in March. 

   The 9 February THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that according to 
the SCCI, the five EPZ's are: 


  EPZ          Location     Date         Size in     Infrastructure 
                                                     investment 
  Name                      Licensed     Hectares    in millions 
  Can Tho      Can Tho      2 Nov 93     57          $8.1 
  Da Nang      Quang Nam-   21  Oct  93  120         $24.0 
               Da Nang 
  Haiphong     Haiphong     12  Jan  93  300        $150.0 
  Linh Trung   Ho Chi Minh  31  Aug  92   60         $14.0 
               City 
  Tan Thuan    Ho Chi Minh  24  Sep  91  300         $89.0 
               City 



   Another article in the same edition reported that, according to 
the vice chairman of the Haiphong EPZ Board of Directors, the EPZ is 
located 16 km southeast of the city and 12 km from Cat Bi airport. 
It is a joint venture between the Haiphong City EPZ Development 
Company and the Hong Kong Very Good International Company Ltd.  It 
will be the largest in Vietnam with  investment worth $2.5 billion 
and will be expanded to 980 hectares, with 300 hectares for 
manufacturing firms and some 600 for hotels, a golf course, offices, 
housing, and a recreational area.  Industries being promoted here 
include textiles, garments, leather goods, paper, packaging 
materials, electronics, machine and transportation equipment, 
precision tools, chemicals, food products, and consumer goods. 
Companies operating here can import equipment and materials and 
export their products all tax free.  Manufacturers will pay a 10 
percent income tax--15 percent for services companies--four years 
after they start making profits. 

   The 9 February THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON also reported that the two 
EPZ'z in Ho Chi Minh City have "gone far" in building infrastructure 
and organizing a state management apparatus to license projects. 
Infrastructure at Tan Thuan is expected to be completed in 1994. 

   So far, eight enterprises have been licensed at Tan Thuan and two 
at Linh Trung.  One firm started to export its products to Europe in 
December, two more are expected to be producing at the end of the 
first quarter of 1994.  More than 30 investors from Taiwan, South 
Korea, Japan, France, Hong Kong, Thailand, Indonesia, and China have 
paid fees to operate in the two EPZ's. 

   The same issue of THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that the Da 
Nang EPZ is organizing its managment and getting ready to build 
infrastructure.  Soon after the EPZ was licensed, companies from 
Malaysia, Japan, Thailand, Singapore, South Korea, Europe, and the 
United States signed up to invest. 

   In contrast with other EPZ's, local companies alone are building 
Can Tho's infrastructure.  According to the vice chairman of Can Tho 
People's Committee, the EPZ is "quickly" organizing its management. 
Thai, Singaporean, Indonesian, and American firms have registered to 
invest in food processing. 

   The 16 March issue of paper reported that SCCI Deputy Director Lu 
Minh Chau, who is also director of the Ho Chi Minh City EPZ's 
Management Board, said that for the time being, no more EPZ's should 
be built.  Instead, there should be studies made on other types of 
investment such as industrial parks, special economic compounds, and 
free trade zones.  Pilot projects must be established for these when 
conditions are favorable. 

   Thai Firm To Build Industrial Zone at Bien Hoa - Bang Pakong 
Industrial Park, a Thai real estate development company, has reached 
agreement with the Vietnamese Government to develop the former U.S. 
military base at Bien Hoa, near Ho Chi Minh City, into a large 
industrial zone under a joint venture arrangement with a Bien Hoa 
company.  The government will give 800 hectares to the joint venture 
company free of charge. 

   After site preparation work is completed, lots will be sold to 
"influential companies" from Thailand, Japan, Europe, and the United 
States.  The amount of investment capital for the new company has 
not been decided, but total investment in the project will come to 
$400 million. Bang Pakong's president will also serve as president 
of the joint venture firm. 

   In June 1994 Bang Pakong will begin selling lots to Thai and 
Japanese companies.  The first 100-hectare section of the zone will 
be completed by August, and construction of the entire zone should 
be completed by August 1995.  Some 200 to 300 factories will be 
built, with the focus on those devoted to "labor-intensive 
production." 

   Bang Pakong, which was established in 1987, has completed the 
development of a large industrial zone in Chonburi, southeast of 
Bangkok, where it has sold lots to Japanese firms.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 26 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Ministry's Plan for Development of Auto Industry - The Ministry 
of Heavy Industry will propose that future SRV automobile production 
be based on the number of vehicles per thousand population and per 
capita income. 

   According to the plan, by 2005 the Vietnamese market will need up 
to 17,300 passenger cars and up to 63,600 commercial vehicles per 
year.  To maximize return on investment in the auto industry, the 
number of joint venture assembly plants should be limited to three 
to four for commercial vehicles and two for passenger cars.  One 
hundred percent foreign-owned plants must be probihited, unless the 
output is for export only. 

   To avoid letting any one country dominate Vietnam's auto 
industry, it will be necessary to acquire technology from the United 
States, Western Europe, and Japan.  Technology transfer is seen as 
more important than profit. 

   The ministry should recommend that the government stop issuing 
permits to build assembly plants in order to encourage well known 
international manufacturers to enter ventures as Italy's Ivesco has 
done with the Mekong Auto Plant. 

   In 1991, joint venture licences were issued for the Co Loa 
Factory in Hanoi, the Cuu Long Machine Factory, and the Hoa Binh 
auto plant with ROK and Philippine partners.  In late 1993, a third 
joint venture with Daewoo was licensed.  At present, the Mekong Auto 
plant and the Vietnam auto plant "VMC" have started production. 
These two plants have a capacity of nearly 5,000 vehicles per year. 

   To support the local auto industry, the government has increased 
the import duty on fully assembled vehicles from 100 to 150 percent 
and has reduced the import duty on CKD vehicle kits to 20 percent. 
(Hanoi QUAN DOI NHAN DAN 15 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Park Resort Venture With Singaporean Company - Hanoi's Tourist 
Hotels Company under the Hanoi Labor Union recently formed a joint 
venture with Singapore's Keppel Group's Straits Steamship Land 
Company to build the Ho Tay-Quang Ba National Park in Hanoi.  Total 
investment is $98-$110 million.  Prescribed capital is $56 million, 
of which the Vietnamese partner will contribute 30 percent.  The 
park resort will include a golf course and a five-star 300-room 
hotel with tennis courts, and will be completed in 30 months. (Hanoi 
THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 16 Mar 94 p 

   Minister Outlines Measures to Facilitiate Investment - At a 
January meeting, Minister Dau Ngoc Xuan, chairman of the State 
Commission for Cooperation and Investment, discussed foreign 
investment and viewed eight issues which require prompt attention: 

   1.  The government is urgently drafting policies to promote 
investment in afforestation and industrial crops in the mountainous 
and central regions.  It will improve its tax policy and will soon 
promulgate legislation governing labor, commerce, real estate, and 
mining. 

   2. During the second quarter of 1994 at the latest, two plans 
will be completed concerning investment in export processing zones 
and to assist a number of sectors facing tough competition, 
including beer brewing and automobile- and motorbike assembly. 

   3.  In the capitalization of joint ventures, steps will be taken 
so that Vietnamese partners no longer contribute primarily real 
estate.  Firms will be allowed to pool capital with foreigners, and 
capital will be raised from the population for projects certain to 
have high economic return. 

   4.  The government has tasked the Ministry of Industry, Science, 
and Environment and specialized branches to develop a policy on 
machinery imports.  Technical and industrial consulting firms will 
be formed. 

   5.  Regulations on labor conditions and pay at foreign firms will 
be issued.  There will be inspections to protect workers' rights and 
to avoid "regrettable" incidents. 

   6.  By the end of first quarter of 1994, the state's oversight of 
foreign industries will be improved, with many administrative 
procedures  simplified.  Projects involving less than $5 million 
will get permits in not more than 45 days.  Approvals will be 
primarily based on the recommendations of the city or province and 
economic or technical agency concerned. 

   7.  Procedures for the initiation, development, and government 
review of investment projects will be simplified to the maximum 
extent possible. 

   8.  About 2,500 Vietnamese cadres work in joint-venture firms. 
Most are appointed by local authorities.  Very few have the 
necessary qualifications and experience needed to work with foreign 
investors.  In the future, cadres for joint ventures will be found 
through competitive testing.  Courses to train these cadres will be 
organised quickly. 
   Minister Xuan said that Vietnam is past the stage of "testing the 
waters on the concept of foreign investment."  Efforts must be made 
to attract some $14 billion from 1991 (as published) to 2000. 
(Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 26 Jan 94 p 5) 

   Prices, Export-Import Value Increase in First Quarter - The price 
indices of goods and services in the first quarter of 1994 showed an 
average increase of 2.6 percent per month.  Goods available were 
diversified and their prices rather stable.  The total value of 
retail sales--of which the state sector accounted for 23 percent- 
-increased 25 percent over the same period last year.  The total 
export-import value in the first quarter was estimated at about 
$1.418 billion.  Exports--mainly rice, garments, textiles, and crude 
oil--were worth $670 million, up 27 percent.  The total import value 
was estimated at $748 million, up 12 percent over the corresponding 
period last year.  The Ministry of Trade plans to achieve a total 
export-import value of $3.3 billion in the first half of this year, 
an increase of between 23 and 27 percent over the first half of 
1993.  (Hanoi VNA 0555 GMT 5 Apr 94) 

   Heavy Industries Increase Output in First Quarter - In the first 
quarter of 1994, business and production establishments under the 
Ministry of Heavy Industry achieved a total output of $2.8 million, 
8 percent better than the same period last year.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1100 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   Taiwan Firms Join Sugar Production Venture - The Sugar 
Corporation No. 1, Thanh Hoa Sugar Company, and Taiwan's Taiwan 
Sugar Corporation, I-Mei Foods Company, King Car Foods, and Fu Mei 
Foods have signed a joint venture contract establishing the Vietnam- 
Taiwan Sugar Ltd. Company.  The venture is expected to process 6,000 
metric tons of cane per day, becoming the biggest sugar producer in 
Vietnam.  The $66 million project is expected to begin this year and 
create nearly 10,000 jobs. (Hanoi VNA 1439 GMT 2 Apr 94) 

   HCMC Lists 265 Projects Needing Foreign Investment - Ho Chi Minh 
City has listed 265 projects that need foreign investment between 
now and 1995.  According to the plan, the city will have 15 
industrial areas for mechanical, processing, electronics, and hi- 
tech businesses.  Other projects include 13 infrastructure projects, 
22 technical construction projects to modernize residential areas, 
transport, airports, ports, and post and telecommunications 
networks, 130 development projects in mechanical, metallurgy, 
processing of agro-forestry-fishery products, chemicals, 
construction material, and textiles, 26 projects in agricultural 
products, and 29 projects for upgrading tourist centers and hotels. 
The total capital for these projects is envisaged at nearly $9 
billion.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Coffee Output Reported; Exporters Using Direct Contracts - In the 
first five months of the 1993-1994 coffee crop, Vietnam exported 
more than 100,000 tonnes of beans.  Exporters have won direct 
contracts to sell their products abroad, reducing exports through 
intermediaries to 41 percent, down from 60 percent last year.  This 
year Vietnam has about 137,000 hectares of coffee, yielding an 
average of one tonne per hectare. It is expecting to harvest between 
125,000 and 135,000 tonnes. (Hanoi VNA 1358 GMT 5 Apr 94) 

   Cashew Growers Earn Over $40 Million in 1993 - Last year, 
southern cashew growers earned over $40 million by exporting 53,000 
tons of cashew nuts.  The 1994 harvest is expected to yield 70,000 
tons.  Vietnam ranks third among cashew exporters after Brazil and 
India.  Twenty-two cashew processing enterprises with a total 
capacity of 75,000 tons per year are now operational.  (Hanoi VNA 
1346 GMT 6 Apr 94) 

   Transformer Manufacture With Switzerland Reported - The Ministry 
of Heavy Industry and the ABB Transformer, Ltd. of Switzerland 
recently signed a joint venture agreement to manufacture 
transformers and other electric appliances in Hanoi.  The Vietnamese 
partner will contribute 35 percent of the $8.7 million, 35-year 
venture.  (Hanoi VNA 1459 GMT 9 Apr) 

   First Quarter Foreign Investment Figures in Dong Nai Reported - 
The Mekong Delta Province of Dong Nai reported eight additional 
foreign investment projects in the first quarter of this year, 
amounting to $46.85 million.  Presently, there are 65 foreign 
investment projects in Dong Nai with a total capital of $878.85 
million.  Prominent among these projects are the Hualon Dyeing 
United Enterprise, capitalized at $242 million, the Vedan Stock 
Corporation at $216 million, and the Vietnam Soda Chemicals at $76.7 
million.  (Hanoi VNA 1424 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   National Power Company To Start Operation in May - The 
Electricity Company No. 2 announced that the national 500-kv power 
grid will start operation in May.  The grid will have the capacity 
to provide power to 19 provinces and cities in the south, spreading 
from Ninh Thuan to Minh Hai.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1100 GMT 7 Apr 
94) 

   Construction Begins on Bach Ho-Ba Ria Gas Pipeline - Petrovietnam 
and Hyundai Heavy Industries on 9 April started building a gas 
pipeline from the Bach Ho (White Tiger) Oil Field to the Ba Ria 
Power Plant.  This is the first phase of the $400 million gas 
collection and transportation system from the Bach Ho field to the 
Thu Duc Power Plant in Ho Chi Minh City and is scheduled to be 
completed by October.  A 107-km pipeline will be built from Bach Ho 
to the Ky Van area in Long Hai Township, and a 19.5-km onshore line 
will be built from Long Hai to the Ba Ria plant.  The line's 
capacity is 300 million cubic meters of gas per year.  Phase two 
will involve building an LPG plant in Ba Ria and about 85 km of 
pipeline to the Thu Duc plant.  The gas collection and 
transportation systems will have a capacity of 1.5 billion cubic 
meters per year.  At present about 3 million cubic meters of gas is 
burned each day at Bach Ho. (Hanoi VNA 11 Apr 94) 
EAG/20APR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP JEG 21/0031Z APR 





